The Project Gutenberg eBook, Three Little Women, by Gabrielle E. Jackson


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org





Title: Three Little Women
       A Story for Girls


Author: Gabrielle E. Jackson



Release Date: November 15, 2011  [eBook #38029]

Language: English


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THREE LITTLE WOMEN***


E-text prepared by Roger Frank and the Online Distributed Proofreading
Team (http://www.pgdp.net)



Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
      file which includes the original illustration.
      See 38029-h.htm or 38029-h.zip:
      (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/38029/38029-h/38029-h.htm)
      or
      (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/38029/38029-h.zip)





[Illustration: "Good-bye, Baltie, dear"]


THREE LITTLE WOMEN, A STORY FOR GIRLS

by

GABRIELLE E. JACKSON

1913



CONTENTS
    CHAPTER I--The Carruths
    CHAPTER II--"Baltie"
    CHAPTER III--The Spirit of Mad Anthony
    CHAPTER IV--Baltie is Rescued
    CHAPTER V--A New Member of the Family
    CHAPTER VI--Blue Monday
    CHAPTER VII--Mammy Generalissimo
    CHAPTER VIII--Chemical Experiments
    CHAPTER IX--Spontaneous Combustion
    CHAPTER X--Readjustment
    CHAPTER XI--First Ventures
    CHAPTER XII--Another Shoulder is Added
    CHAPTER XIII--The Battle of Town and Gown
    CHAPTER XIV--The Candy Enterprise Grows
    CHAPTER XV--The Reckoning
    CHAPTER XVI--United We Stand, Divided We Fall
    CHAPTER XVII--A Family Council
    CHAPTER XVIII--"Save Me From My Friends"
    CHAPTER XIX--"An Auction Extraordinary"
    CHAPTER XX--Constance B.'s Venture
    CHAPTER XXI--Constance B.'s Candies
    CHAPTER XXII--First Steps
    CHAPTER XXIII--Opening Day
    CHAPTER XXIV--One Month Later




CHAPTER I

The Carruths


The afternoon was a wild one. All day driving sheets of rain had swept
along the streets of Riveredge, hurled against windowpanes by fierce
gusts of wind, or dashed in miniature rivers across piazzas. At noon
it seemed as though the wind meant to change to the westward and the
clouds break, but the promise of better weather had failed, and
although the rain now fell only fitfully in drenching showers, and one
could "run between the drops" the wind still blustered and fumed,
tossing the wayfarers about, and tearing from the trees what foliage
the rain had spared, to hurl it to the ground in sodden masses. It was
more like a late November than a late September day, and had a
depressing effect upon everybody.

"I want to go out; I want to go out; I want to go out, _out_, OUT!"
cried little Jean Carruth, pressing her face against the window-pane
until from the outside her nose appeared like a bit of white paper
stuck fast to the glass.

"If you do you'll get wet, _wet_, WET, as sop, _sop_, SOP, and then
mother'll ask what _we_ were about to let you," said a laughing voice
from the farther side of the room, where Constance, her sister, nearly
five years her senior, was busily engaged in trimming a hat, holding
it from her to get the effect of a fascinating bow she had just pinned
upon one side.

"But I haven't a single thing to do. All my lessons for Monday are
finished; I'm tired of stories; I'm tired of fancy work, and I'm tired
of--_everything_ and I want to go _out_," ended the woe-begone voice in
rapid crescendo.

"Do you think it would hurt her to go, Eleanor?" asked Constance,
turning toward a girl who sat at a pretty desk, her elbows resting
upon it and her hands propping her chin as she pored over a copy of
the French Revolution, but who failed to take the least notice of the
question.

Constance made a funny face and repeated it. She might as well have
kept silent for all the impression it made, and with a resigned nod
toward Jean she resumed her millinery work.

But too much depended upon the reply for Jean Carruth to accept the
situation so mildly. Murmuring softly, "You wait a minute," she
slipped noiselessly across the room and out into the broad hall
beyond. Upon a deep window-seat stood a papier-mâché megaphone.
Placing it to her lips, her eyes dancing with mischief above its rim,
she bellowed:

"Eleanor Maxwell Carruth, do you think it would hurt me to go out
now?"

The effect was electrical. Bounding from her chair with sufficient
alacrity to send the French Revolution crashing upon the floor,
Eleanor Carruth clapped both hands over her ears, as she cried:

"Jean, you little imp of mischief!"

"Well, I wanted to make you hear me," answered that young lady
complacently. "Constance had spoken to you twice but you'd gone to
France and couldn't hear her, so I thought maybe the megaphone would
reach across the Atlantic Ocean, and it _did_. Now can I go out?"

"_Can_ you or may you? which do you mean," asked the eldest sister
somewhat sententiously.

Constance laughed softly in her corner.

"O, fiddlesticks on your old English! I get enough of it five days in
a week without having to take a dose of it Saturday afternoon too. I
know well enough that I _can_ go out, but whether you'll say yes is
another question, and I want to," and Jean puckered up her small
pug-nose at her sister.

"What a spunky little body it is," said the latter, laughing in spite
of herself, for Jean, the ten-year-old baby of the family was already
proving that she was likely to be a very lively offspring of the
Carruth stock.

"And where are you minded to stroll on this charming afternoon when
everybody else is glad to sit in a snug room and take a Saturday
rest?"

"Mother isn't taking hers," was the prompt retort. "She's down helping
pack the boxes that are to go to that girls' college out in Iowa. She
went in all the rain right after luncheon, and I guess if _she_ can go
out while it poured 'cats and dogs,' I can when--when--when--well it
doesn't even pour _cats_. It's almost stopped raining."

"Where _do_ you get hold of those awful expressions, Jean? Whoever
heard of 'cats and dogs' pouring down? What _am_ I to do with you? I
declare I feel responsible for your development and--"

"Then let me go _out_. I need some fresh air to develop in: my lungs
don't pump worth a cent in this stuffy place. It's hot enough to roast
a pig with those logs blazing in the fire-place. I don't see how you
stand it."

"Go get your rubber boots and rain coat," said Eleanor resignedly.
"You're half duck, I firmly believe, and never so happy as when you're
splashing through puddles. Thank goodness your skirts are still short,
and you can't very well get _them_ sloppy; and your boots will keep
your legs dry unless you try wading up to your hips. But where are you
going?"

"I'm going down to Amy Fletcher's to see how Bunny is. He got hurt
yesterday and it's made him dreadfully sick," answered Jean, as she
struggled with her rubber boots, growing red in the face as she tugged
at them. In five minutes she was equipped to do battle with almost any
storm, and with a "Good bye! I'll be back pretty soon, and then I'll
have enough fresh air to keep me in fine shape for the night," out she
flew, banging the front door behind her.

Eleanor watched the lively little figure as it went skipping down the
street, a street which was always called a beautiful one, although now
wet and sodden with the rain, for Mr. Carruth had built his home in a
most attractive part of the delightful town of Riveredge. Maybe you
won't find it on the map by that name, but it's _there_ just the same,
and quite as attractive to-day as it was several years ago.

Bernard Carruth had been a man of refined taste and possessed a keen
appreciation of all that was beautiful, so it was not surprising that
he should have chosen Riveredge when deciding upon a place for his
home. Situated as it was on the banks of the splendid stream which had
suggested its name, the town boasted unusual attractions, and drew to
it an element which soon assured its development in the most
satisfactory manner. It became noted for its beautiful homes, its
cultured people and its delightful social life.

Among the prettiest of its homes was Bernard Carruth's. It stood but a
short way from the river's bank, was built almost entirely of
cobble-stones, oiled shingles being used where the stones were not
practicable.

It was made up of quaint turns and unexpected corners, although not a
single inch of space, or the shape of a room was sacrificed to the
oddity of the architecture. It was not a very large house nor yet a
very small one, but as Mr. Carruth said when all was completed, the
house sensibly and artistically furnished, and his family comfortably
installed therein:

"It is big enough for the big girl, our three little girls and their
old daddy, and so what more can be asked? Only that the good Lord will
spare us to each other to enjoy it."

This was when Jean was but a little more than two years of age, and
for five years they _did_ enjoy it as only a closely united family can
enjoy a charming home. Then one of Mr. Carruth's college chums got
into serious financial difficulties and Bernard Carruth indorsed
heavily for him.

The sequel was the same wretched old story repeated: Ruin overtook the
friend, and Bernard Carruth's substance was swept into the maelstrom
which swallowed up everything. He never recovered from the blow, or
false representations which led to it, learning unhappily, when the
mischief was done, how sorely he had been betrayed, and within
eighteen months from the date of indorsing his friend's paper he was
laid away in pretty Brookside Cemetery, leaving his wife and three
daughters to face the world upon a very limited income. This was a
little more than two years before the opening of this story. Little
Jean was now ten and a half, Constance fifteen and Eleanor, the
eldest, nearly seventeen, although many judged her to be older, owing
to her quiet, reserved manner and studious habits, for Eleanor was,
undoubtedly, "the brainy member of the family," as Constance put it.

She was a pupil in the Riveredge Seminary, and would graduate the
following June; a privilege made possible by an aunt's generosity,
since Mrs. Carruth had been left with little more than her home, which
Mr. Carruth had given her as soon as it was completed, and the
interest upon his life insurance which amounted to less than fifteen
hundred a year; a small sum upon which to keep up the home, provide
for and educate three daughters.

Constance was now a pupil at the Riveredge High School and Jean at the
grammar school. Both had been seminary pupils prior to Mr. Carruth's
death, but expenses had to be curtailed at once.

Constance was the domestic body of the household; prettiest of the
three, sunshiny, happy, resourceful, she faced the family's altered
position bravely, giving up the advantages and delights of the
seminary without a murmur and contributing to her mother's peace of
mind to a degree she little guessed by taking the most optimistic view
of the situation and meeting altered conditions with a laugh and a
song, and the assurance that "_some_ day she was going to make her
fortune and set 'em all up in fine shape once more." She got her
sanguine disposition from her mother who never looked upon the dull
side of the clouds, although it was often a hard matter to win around
to their shiny side.

Eleanor was quite unlike her; indeed, Eleanor did not resemble either
her father or mother, for Mr. Carruth had been a most genial,
warm-hearted man, and unselfish to the last degree. Eleanor was very
reserved, inclined to keep her affairs to herself, and extremely
matured for her years, finding her relaxation and recreation in a
manner which the average girl of her age would have considered tasks.

Jean was a bunch of nervous impulses, and no one ever knew where the
madcap would bounce up next. She was a beautiful child with a mop of
wavy reddish-brown hair falling in the softest curls about face and
shoulders; eyes that shone lustrous and lambent as twin stars beneath
their delicately arched brows, and regarded you with a steadfast
interest as though they meant to look straight through you, and
separate truth from falsehood. A mouth that was a whimsical
combination of fun and resolution. A nose that could pucker
disdainfully on provocation, and it never needed a greater than its
owner's doubt of the sincerity of the person addressing her.

This is the small person skipping along the pretty Riveredge street
toward the more sparsely settled northern end of the town, hopping
_not from_ dry spot to dry spot _between_ the puddles, but _into_ and
_into_ the deepest to be found. Amy Fletcher's home was one of the
largest in the outskirts of Riveredge and its grounds the most
beautiful. Between it and Riveredge stood an old stone house owned and
occupied by a family named Raulsbury; a family noted for its parsimony
and narrow outlook upon life in general. Broad open fields lay between
this house and the Fletcher place which was some distance beyond. In
many places the fences were broken; at one point the field was a good
deal higher than the road it bordered and a deep gully lay between it
and the sidewalk.

When Jean reached that point of her moist, breezy walk she stopped
short. In the mud of the gully, drenched, cold and shivering lay an
old, blind bay horse. He had stumbled into it, and was too feeble to
get out.




CHAPTER II

"Baltie"


  "When he's forsaken
  Withered and shaken
  What can an old _horse_
  Do but die?"

  (With apologies to Tom Hood.)

For one moment Jean stood petrified, too overcome by the sight to stir
or speak, then with a low, pitying cry of:

"Oh, Baltie, Baltie! How came you there?" the child tossed her
umbrella aside and scrambled down into the ditch, the water which
stood in it splashing and flying all over her, as she hastened toward
the prone horse.

At the sound of her voice the poor creature raised his head which had
been drooping forward upon his bent-up knees, turned his sightless
eyes toward her and tried to nicker, but succeeded only in making a
quavering, shivering sound.

"Oh, Baltie, dear, dear Baltie, how did you get out of your stable and
come way off here?" cried the girl taking the pathetic old head into
her arms, and drawing it to her breast regardless of the mud with
which it was thickly plastered. "You got out of the field through that
broken place in the fence up there didn't you dear? And you must have
tumbled right straight down the bank into this ditch, 'cause you're
all splashed over with mud, poor, poor Baltie. And your legs are all
cut and bleeding too. Oh, how long have you been here? You couldn't
see where you were going, could you? You poor, dear thing. Oh, what
shall I do for you? What shall I? If I could only help you up," and
the dauntless little body tugged with all her might and main to raise
the fallen animal. She might as well have striven to raise Gibraltar,
for, even though the horse strove to get upon his feet, he was far too
weak and exhausted to do so, and again dropped heavily to the ground,
nearly over-setting his intrepid little friend as he sank down.

Jean was in despair. What _should_ she do? To go on to her friend
Amy's and leave the old horse to the chance of someone else's tender
mercies never entered her head, and had any one been near at hand to
suggest that solution of the problem he would have promptly found
himself in the midst of a small tornado of righteous wrath. No, here
lay misery incarnate right before her eyes and, of course, she must
instantly set about relieving it. But how?

"Baltie," or Old Baltimore, as the horse was called, belonged to the
Raulsbury's. Everybody within a radius of twenty miles knew him; knew
also that the family had brought him to the place when they came there
from the suburbs of Baltimore more than twenty years ago. Brought him
a high-stepping, fiery, thoroughbred colt which was the admiration and
envy of all Riveredge. John Raulsbury, the grandfather, was his owner
then, and drove him until his death, when "Baltimore" was seventeen
years old; even that was an advanced age for a horse. From the moment
of Grandfather Raulsbury's death Baltimore began to fail and lose his
high spirits. Some people insisted that he was grieving for the friend
of his colt-hood and the heyday of life, but Jabe Raulsbury, the son,
said "the horse was gettin' played out. What could ye expect when he
was more'n seventeen years old?"

So Baltimore became "Old Baltie," and his fate the plow, the dirt
cart, the farm wagon. His box-stall, fine grooming, and fine harness
were things of the past. "The barn shed's good 'nough fer such an old
skate's he's gettin' ter be," said Jabe, and Jabe's son, a shiftless
nonentity, agreed with him.

So that was blue-blooded Baltie's fate, but even such misfortune
failed to break his spirit, and now and again, while plodding
hopelessly along the road, dragging the heavy farm wagon, he would
raise his head, prick up his ears, and plunge ahead, forgetful of his
twenty years, when he heard a speedy step behind him. But, alas! his
sudden sprint always came to a most humiliating end, for his strength
had failed rapidly during the past few years, and the eyes, once so
alert and full of fire, were sadly clouded, making steps very
uncertain. An ugly stumble usually ended in a cruel jerk upon the
still sensitive mouth and poor old Baltie was reduced to the
humiliating plod once more.

Yet, through it all he retained his sweet, high-bred disposition,
accepting his altered circumstances like the gentleman he was, and
never retaliating upon those who so misused him. During his
twenty-third year he became totally blind, and when rheumatism, the
outcome of the lack of proper stabling and care, added to his
miseries, poor Baltie was almost turned adrift; the shed was there, to
be sure, and when he had time to think about it, Jabe dumped some feed
into the manger and threw a bundle of straw upon the floor. But for
the greater part of the time Baltie had to shift for himself as best
he could.

During the past summer he had been the talk of an indignant town, and
more than one threatening word had been spoken regarding the man's
treatment of the poor old horse.

For a moment the little girl stood in deep, perplexing thought, then
suddenly her face lighted up and her expressive eyes sparkled with the
thoughts which lay behind them.

"I know what I'll do, Baltie: I'll go straight up to Jabe Raulsbury's
and _make_ him come down and take care of you. Good-bye, dear; I won't
be any time at all 'cause I'll go right across the fields," and giving
the horse a final encouraging stroke, she caught up her umbrella which
had meantime been resting handle uppermost up in a mud-puddle, and
scrambling up the bank which had been poor Baltie's undoing,
disappeared beneath the tumble-down fence and was off across the
pasture heedless of all obstacles.

Jabe Raulsbury's farm had once been part of Riveredge, but one by one
his broad acres had been sold so that now only a small section of the
original farmstead remained to him, and this was a constant eyesore to
his neighbors, owing to its neglected condition, for beautiful homes
had been erected all about it upon the acres he had sold at such a
large profit. Several good offers had been made him for his property
by those who would gladly have bought the land simply to have improved
their own places and thus add to the attraction of that section of
Riveredge. But no; not another foot of his farm would Jabe Raulsbury
sell, and if ever dog-in-the-manger was fully demonstrated it was by
this parsimonious irascible man whom no one respected and many
heartily despised.

This wild, wet afternoon he was seated upon a stool just within the
shelter of his barn sorting over a pile of turnips which lay upon the
floor near him. He was not an attractive figure, to say the least, as
he bent over the work. Cadaverous, simply because he was too
parsimonious to provide sufficient nourishing food to meet the demands
of such a huge body. Unkempt, grizzled auburn hair and grizzled auburn
beard, the latter sparse enough to disclose the sinister mouth. Eyes
about the color of green gooseberries and with about as much
expression.

As he sat there tossing into the baskets before him the sorted-out
turnips, he became aware of rapidly approaching footsteps, and raised
his head just as a small figure came hurrying around the corner of the
barn, for the scramble up the steep bank, and rapid walk across the
wet pastures, had set Jean's heart a-beating, and that, coupled with
her indignation, caused her to pant. She had gone first to the house,
but had there learned from Mrs. Raulsbury, a timid, nervous,
woefully-dominated individual, who looked and acted as though she
scarcely dared call her soul her own, that "Jabe was down yonder in
the far-barn sortin' turnips." So down to the "far-barn" went Jean.

"Good afternoon, Mr. Raulsbury," she began, her heart, it must be
confessed, adding, rather than lessening its number of beats, at
confronting the forbidding expression of the individual with whom she
was passing the time of day.

"Huh!" grunted Jabe Raulsbury, giving her one searching look from
between his narrowing eyelids, and then resuming his work. Most
children would have been discouraged and dropped the conversation then
and there. Jean's lips took on a firmer curve.

"I guess after all it _isn't_ a good afternoon, is it? It is a pretty
wet, horrid one, and not a very nice one to be out in, is it?"

"Wul, why don't ye go home then?" was the gruff retort.

"Because I have an important matter to 'tend to. I was on my way to
visit Amy Fletcher; her cat is sick! he was hurt dreadfully yesterday;
she thinks somebody must have tried to shoot him and missed him, for
his shoulder is all torn. If anybody _did_ do such a thing to Bunny
they'd ought to be ashamed of it, for he's a dear. If _I_ knew who had
done it I'd--I'd--."

"Wal, what _would_ ye do to 'em, heh?" and a wicked, tantalizing grin
overspread Jabe Raulsbury's face.

"Do? Do? I believe I'd scratch his eyes out; I'd hate him so, for
being so cruel!" was the fiery, unexpected reply.

"Do tell! Would ye now, really? Mebbe it's jist as well fer him that
ye don't know the feller that did it then," remarked Raulsbury,
although he gave a slight hitch to the stool upon which he was sitting
as he said it, thus widening the space between them.

"Well I believe I _would_, for I _despise_ a coward, and only a coward
could do such a thing."

"Huh," was the response to this statement. Then silence for a moment
was broken by the man who asked:

"Wal, why don't ye go along an' see if the cat's kilt. It aint
_here_."

"No, I know _that_, but I have found something more important to 'tend
to, and that's why I came up here, and it's something you ought to
know about too: Old Baltie has tumbled down the bank at the place in
the pasture where the fence is broken, and is in the ditch. I don't
know how long he's been there, but he's all wet, and muddy and shivery
and he can't get up. I came up to tell you, so's you could get a man
to help you and go right down and get him out. I tried, but I wasn't
strong enough, but he'll die if you don't go quick."

Jean's eyes shone and her cheeks were flushed from excitement as she
described Baltie's plight, and paused only because breath failed her.

"Wal, 'spose he does; what then? What good is he to anybody? He's most
twenty-five year old an' clear played-out. He'd better die; it's the
best thing could happen."

The shifty eyes had not rested upon the child while the man was
speaking, but some powerful magnetism drew and held them to her deep
blazing ones as the last word fell from his lips. He tried to withdraw
them, ejected a mouthful of tobacco juice at one particular spot which
from appearances had been so favored many times before, drew his hand
across his mouth and then gave a self-conscious, snickering laugh.

"I don't believe you understood what I said, did you?" asked Jean
quietly. "I'm sure you didn't."

"Oh yis I did. Ye said old Baltie was down in the ditch yonder and
like ter die if I didn't git him out. Wal, that's jist 'zactly what I
want him _to_ do, an' jest 'zactly what I turned him out inter that
field fer him ter do, an' jist 'zactly what I hope he _will_ do 'fore
morning. He's got the last ounce o' fodder I'm ever a'goin' ter give
him, an' I aint never a'goin' ter let him inter my barns agin. Now put
_that_ in yer pipe an' smoke it, an' then git out durned quick."

Jabe Raulsbury had partially risen from his stool as he concluded this
creditable tirade, and one hand was raised threateningly toward the
little figure standing with her dripping umbrella just within the
threshold of the barn door.

That the burly figure did not rise entirely, and that his hand
remained suspended without the threatened blow falling can perhaps
best be explained by the fact that the child before him never
flinched, and that the scorn upon her face was so intense that it
could be felt.




CHAPTER III

The Spirit of Mad Anthony


Jean Carruth stood thus for about one minute absolutely rigid, her
face the color of chalk and her eyes blazing. Then several things
happened with extreme expedition. The position of the closed umbrella
in her hands reversed with lightning-like rapidity; one quick step
_forward_, _not_ backward, was made, thus giving the intrepid little
body a firmer foothold, and then crash! down came the gun-metal handle
across Jabe Raulsbury's ample-sized nasal appendage.

The blow, with such small arms to launch it, was not of necessity a
very powerful one, but it was the suddenness of the onslaught which
rendered it effective, for not one sound had issued from the child's
set lips as she delivered it, and Jabe's position placed him at a
decided disadvantage.

He resumed his seat with considerable emphasis, and clapping his hand
to his injured feature, bellowed in the voice of an injured bull:

"You--you--you little devil! You--you, let me get hold of you!"

But Jean did not obey the command or pause to learn the result of her
deed. With a storm of the wildest sobs she turned and fled from the
barnyard, down the driveway leading to the road, and back to the spot
where she had left Baltie in his misery, her tears nearly blinding
her, and her indignation almost strangling her; back to the poor old
horse, so sorely in need of human pity and aid.

This, all unknown to his little champion, had already reached him, for
hardly had Jean disappeared beneath the tumble-down fence, than a
vehicle came bowling along the highway driven by no less a personage
than Hadyn Stuyvesant, lately elected president of the local branch of
the S. P. C. A. Poor old Baltie's days of misery had come to an end,
for here was the authority either to compel his care or to mercifully
release him from his sufferings.

Perhaps not more than twenty minutes had elapsed from the time Jean
started across the fields, to the moment of her return to the old
horse, but in those twenty minutes Mr. Stuyvesant had secured aid from
Mr. Fletcher's place, and when Jean came hurrying upon the scene, her
sobs still rendering breathing difficult, and her troubled little face
bathed in tears, she found three men standing near Baltie.

"Oh, Baltie, Baltie, Baltie, I'm so glad! So glad! So glad!" sobbed
the overwrought little girl, as she flew to the old horse's head.

Mr. Stuyvesant and the men stared at her in astonishment.

"Why little girl," cried the former. "Where in this world have _you_
sprung from? And what is the matter? Is this your horse?"

"Oh, no--no; he isn't mine. It's old Baltie; don't you know him? I went
to tell Jabe Raulsbury about him and he--he--" and Jean paused
embarrassed.

"Yes? Well? Is this his horse? Is he coming to get him? Did you find
him?"

"Yes, sir, I _found_ him," answered Jean, trembling from excitement
and her exertions.

"And is he coming right down?" persisted Mr. Stuyvesant, looking
keenly, although not unkindly, at the child.

"He--he--, oh, _please_ don't make me tell tales on anybody--it's so
mean--but he--"

"You might as well tell it right out an' done with it, little gal,"
broke in one of the men. "It ain't no state secret; everybody knows
that that old skinflint has been abusing this horse shameful, for
months past, an' I'll bet my month's wages he said he wouldn't come
down, an' he hoped the horse 'd die in the ditch. Come now, out with
it--_didn't_ he?"

Jean would not answer, but there was no need for words; her eyes told
the truth.

Just then the other man came up to her; he was one of Mr. Fletcher's
grooms.

"Aren't you Mrs. Carruth's little girl?" he asked.

But before Jean had time to answer Jabe Raulsbury came running along
the road, one hand holding a handkerchief to his nose, the other
waving wildly as he shouted:

"Just you wait 'till I lay my hands on you--you little wild cat!" He
was too blinded by his rage to realize the situation into which he was
hurrying.

Again Anthony Wayne's spirit leaped into Jean's eyes, as the dauntless
little creature whirled about to meet the enemy descending upon her.
With head erect, and nostrils quivering she stood as though rooted to
the ground.

"Great guns! How's _that_ for a little thoroughbred?" murmured the
groom, laughing softly.

Reaching out a protecting hand, Mr. Stuyvesant gently pushed the
little girl toward the man who stood behind him, and taking her place
let Jabe Raulsbury come head-on to his fate. Had the man been less
enraged he would have taken in the situation at once, but his nose
still pained severely from the well-aimed blow, and had also bled
pretty freely, so it is not surprising that he lost his presence of
mind.

"Go slow! Go slow! You are exactly the man I want to see," said Mr.
Stuyvesant, laying a detaining hand upon Jabe's arm.

"Who 'n thunder air you?" demanded the half-blinded man.

"Someone you would probably rather not meet at this moment, but since
you have appeared upon the scene so opportunely I think we might as
well come to an understanding at once, and settle some scores."

"I ain't got no scores to settle with you, but I have with _that_
little demon, an' by gosh she'll know it, when I've done with her! Why
that young 'un has just smashed me over the head with her umbril, I
tell ye. _There_ it is, if ye don't believe what I'm a tellin' ye. I'm
goin' ter have the _law_ on her and on her Ma, I tell ye, an' I call
you three men ter witness the state I'm in. I'll bring suit agin' her
fer big damages--that's what I'll do. Look at my _nose_!"

As he ceased his tirade Jabe removed his handkerchief from the injured
member. At the sight of it one of the men broke into a loud guffaw.
Certainly, for a "weaker vessel" Jean had compassed considerable. That
nose was about the size of two ordinary noses. Mr. Stuyvesant regarded
it for a moment, his face perfectly sober, then asked with apparent
concern:

"And this little girl hit you such a blow as that?"

Poor little Jean began to tremble in her boots. Were the tables about
to turn upon her? Even Anthony Wayne's spirit, when harbored in such a
tiny body could hardly brave _that_. The Fletcher's groom who stood
just behind her watched her closely. Now and again he gave a nod
indicative of his approval.

"Yes she did. She drew off and struck me slam in the face with her
umbril.," averred Jabe.

"Had _you_ struck her? Did she strike in self-defense?" Mr. Stuyvesant
gave a significant look over Jabe's head straight into the groom's
eyes when he asked this question. The response was the slightest nod
of comprehension.

"Strike her? _No_," roared Jabe. "I hadn't teched her. I was a-sittin'
there sortin' out my turnips 's peaceful 's any man in this town, when
that little rip comes 'long and tells me I must go get an old horse
out 'en a ditch: _that_ old skate there that's boun' ter die _any_
how, an' ought ter a-died long ago. I told her ter clear out an' mind
her own business that I hoped the horse _would_ die, an' that's what
I'd turned him out _to_ do. Then she drew off an' whacked me."

"Just because you stated in just so many words that you meant to get
rid of the old horse and had turned him out to die on the roadside. Is
_that_ why she struck you?"

Had Jabe been a little calmer he might have been aware of a change in
Hadyn Stuyvesant's expression and his tone of voice, but men wild with
rage are rarely close observers.

"Yis! Yis!" he snapped, sure now of his triumph.

"Well I'm only sorry the blow was such a light one. I wish it had been
struck by a man's arm and sufficiently powerful to have half killed
you! Even _that_ would have been _too_ good for you, you merciless
brute! I've had you under my eye for your treatment of that poor horse
for some time, and now I have you under my _hand_, and convicted by
your own words in the presence of two witnesses, of absolute cruelty.
I arrest you in the name of the S. P. C. A."

For one brief moment Jabe stood petrified with astonishment. Then the
brute in him broke loose and he started to lay about him right and
left. His aggressiveness was brought to a speedy termination, for at a
slight motion from Mr. Stuyvesant the two men sprang upon him, his
arms were held and the next second there was a slight click and Jabe
Raulsbury's wrists were in handcuffs. That snap was the signal for his
blustering to take flight for he was an arrant coward at heart.

"Now step into my wagon and sit there until I am ready to settle your
case, my man, and that will be when I have looked to this little girl
and the animal which, but for her pluck and courage, might have died
in this ditch," ordered Mr. Stuyvesant.

No whipped cur could have slunk toward the wagon more cowed.

"Now, little lassie, tell me your name and where you live," said Mr.
Stuyvesant lifting Jean bodily into his arms despite her mortification
at being "handled just like a baby," as she afterwards expressed it.

"I am Jean Carruth. I live on Linden Avenue. I'm--I'm terribly ashamed
to be here, and to have struck him," and she nodded toward the humbled
figure in the wagon.

"You need not be. You did not give him one-half he deserves," was the
somewhat comforting assurance.

"O, but what _will_ mother say? She'll be _so_ mortified when I tell
her about it all. It seems as if I just _couldn't_," was the
distressed reply.

"Must you tell her?" asked Mr. Stuyvesant, an odd expression
overspreading his kind, strong face as he looked into the little
girl's eyes.

Jean regarded him with undisguised amazement as she answered simply:

"Why of _course_! That would be deceit if I _didn't_. I'll have to be
punished, but I guess I _ought_ to be," was the naïve conclusion.

The fine face before her was transfigured as Hadyn Stuyvesant
answered:

"Good! _Your_ principles are all right. Stick to them and I'll want to
know you when you are a woman. Now I must get you home for I've a word
to say to your mother, to whom I mean to introduce myself under the
circumstances," and carrying her to his two-seated depot wagon, he
placed her upon the front seat. Jabe glowered at him from the rear
one. His horse turned his head with an inquiring nicker.

"Yes, Comet, I'll be ready pretty soon," he replied, pausing a second
to give a stroke to the satiny neck. Then turning to the men he said:

"Now, my men, let's on with this job which has been delayed too long
already."

He did not spare himself, and presently old Baltie was out of the
ditch and upon his feet--a sufficiently pathetic object to touch any
heart.

"Shall I have the men lead him up to your barn?" asked Hadyn
Stuyvesant, giving the surly object in his wagon a last chance to
redeem himself.

"No! I'm done with him; do your worst," was the gruff answer.

"Very well," the words were ominously quiet, "then _I_ shall take him
in charge."

"Oh, _where_ are you going to take him, please?" asked Jean, her
concern for the horse overcoming her embarrassment at her novel
situation.

"I'm afraid he will have to be sent to the pound, little one, for no
one will claim him."

"Is that the place where they _kill_ them? _Must_ Baltie be killed?"
Her voice was full of tears.

"Unless someone can be found who will care for him for the rest of his
numbered days. I'm afraid it is the best and most merciful fate for
him," was the gentle answer.

"How long may he stay there without being killed? Until maybe somebody
can be found to take him."

"He may stay there one week. But now we must move along. Fasten the
horse's halter to the back of my wagon, men, and I'll see to it that
he is comfortable to-night anyway."

The halter rope was tied, and the strange procession started slowly
back toward Riveredge.




CHAPTER IV

Baltie is Rescued


"How old are you, little lassie?" asked Hadyn Stuyvesant, looking down
upon the little figure beside him, his fine eyes alive with interest
and the smile which none could resist lighting his face, and
displaying his white even teeth.

"I'm just a little over ten," answered Jean, looking up and answering
his smile with one equally frank and trustful, for little Jean Carruth
did not understand the meaning of embarrassment.

"Are you Mrs. Bernard Carruth's little daughter? I knew her nephew
well when at college, although I've been away from Riveredge so long
that I've lost track of her and her family."

"Yes, she is my mother. Mr. Bernard Carruth was my father," and a
little choke came into Jean's voice, for, although not yet eight years
of age when her father passed out of her life, Jean's memory of him
was a very tender one, and she sorely missed the kind, cheery,
sympathetic companionship he had given his children. Hadyn Stuyvesant
was quick to note the catch in the little girl's voice, and the tears
which welled up to her eyes, and a strong arm was placed about her
waist to draw her a little closer to his side, as, changing the
subject, he said very tenderly:

"You have had an exciting hour, little one. Sit close beside me and
don't try to talk; just rest, and let _me_ do the talking. We must go
slowly on Baltie's account; the poor old horse is badly knocked about
and stiffened up. Suppose we go right to Mr. Pringle's livery stable
and ask him to take care of him a few days any way. Don't you think
that would be a good plan?"

"But who will _pay_ for him? Don't you have to pay board for horses
just like people pay their board?" broke in Jean anxiously.

Hadyn Stuyvesant smiled at the practical little being his arm still so
comfortingly encircled.

"I guess the Society can stand the expense," he answered.

"Has it got _lots_ of money to do such things with?" asked Jean, bound
to get at the full facts.

"I'm afraid it hasn't got 'lots of money'--I wish it had,--but I think
it can pay a week's board for old Baltie in consideration of what you
have done for him. It will make you happier to know he will be
comfortable for a little while any way, won't it?"

"Oh, yes! yes! And, and--perhaps _I_ could pay the next week's if we
didn't find somebody the first week. I've got 'most five dollars in my
Christmas bank. I've been saving ever since last January; I always
begin to put in something on New Year's day, if it's only five cents,
and then I never, never take any out 'till it's time to buy our next
Christmas presents. And I really _have_ got 'most five dollars, and
would _that_ be enough for another week?" and the bonny little face
was raised eagerly to her companion's. Hadyn Stuyvesant then and there
lost his heart to the little creature at his side. It is given to very
few "grown-ups" to slip out of their own adult years and by some
magical power pick up the years of their childhood once more, with all
the experiences and view-points of that childhood, but Hadyn
Stuyvesant was one of those few. He felt all the eagerness of Jean's
words and his answer held all the confidence and enthusiasm of _her_
ten years rather than his own twenty-three.

"Fully enough. But we will hope that a home may be found for Baltie
before the first week has come to an end. And here we are at Mr.
Pringle's. Raulsbury I shall have to ask you to get out here," added
Mr. Stuyvesant, as he, himself, sprang from the depot wagon to the
sidewalk.

Raulsbury made no reply but stepped to the sidewalk, where, at a
slight signal from Hadyn Stuyvesant, an officer of the Society who had
his office in the livery stable came forward and motioned to Raulsbury
to follow him. As they disappeared within the stable, Mr. Stuyvesant
said to the proprietor:

"Pringle, I've got a boarder for you. Don't know just how long he will
stay, but remember, nothing is too good for him while he does, for he
is this little girl's protégé, and I hold myself responsible for him."

"All right, Mr. Stuyvesant. All right, sir. He shall have the best the
stable affords. Come on, old stager; you look as if you wanted a
curry-comb and a feed pretty bad," said Pringle, as he untied Baltie's
halter. With all the gentleness of the blue-blooded old fellow he was,
Baltie raised his mud-splashed head, sniffed at Mr. Pringle's coat and
nickered softly, as though acknowledging his proffered hospitality.
The man stroked the muddy neck encouragingly, as he said:

"He don't look much as he did eighteen years ago, does he, Mr.
Stuyvesant?"

"I'm afraid I don't remember how he looked eighteen years ago,
Pringle; there wasn't much of me to remember _with_ about that time.
But I remember how he looked _eight_ years ago, before I went to
Europe, and the contrast is enough to stir me up considerable. It's
about time such conditions were made impossible, and I'm going to see
what I can do to start a move in that direction," concluded Mr.
Stuyvesant, with an ominous nod toward the stable door, through which
Raulsbury had disappeared.

"I'm glad to hear it, sir. We have had too much of this sort of thing
in Riveredge for the past few years. I've been saying the Society
needed a _live_ president and I'm glad it's got one at last."

"Well, look out for old Baltie, and now I must take my little
fellow-worker home," said Mr. Stuyvesant.

"Oh, may I give him just _one_ pat before we go?" begged Jean, looking
from Baltie to Mr. Stuyvesant.

"Lead him up beside us, Pringle," ordered Mr. Stuyvesant smiling his
consent to Jean.

"Good-bye Baltie, dear. Good-bye. I won't forget you for a single
minute; no, not for one," said the little girl earnestly, hugging the
muddy old head and implanting a kiss upon the ear nearest her.

"Baltie you are to be envied, old fellow," said Hadyn Stuyvesant,
laughing softly, and nodding significantly to Pringle. "She was his
first friend in his misery. I'll tell you about it later, but I must
be off now or her family will have me up for a kidnapper. I'll be back
in about an hour."

Ten minutes' swift bowling along behind Hadyn Stuyvesant's beautiful
"Comet" brought them to the Carruth home. Dusk was already beginning
to fall as the short autumn day drew to its end, and Mrs.
Carruth,--mother above all other things--stood at the window watching
for this youngest daughter, regarding whom she never felt quite at
ease when that young lady was out of her sight. When she saw a
carriage turning in at her driveway and that same daughter perched
upon the front seat beside a total stranger she began to believe that
there had been some foundation for the misgivings which had made her
so restless for the past hour. Opening the door she stepped out upon
the piazza to meet the runaway, and was greeted with:

"Oh mother, mother, I've had such an exciting experience! I started to
see Amy Fletcher, but before I got there I found him in the ditch and
lame and muddy and dirty, and I went up to tell Jabe he _must_ go get
him out and then I got awful angry and banged him with my umbrella,
and then I cried and _he_ found me," with a nod toward her companion,
"and he got him out of the ditch and gave Jabe _such_ a scolding and
took him to Mr. Pringle's and he's going to curry-comb him and get the
mud all off of him and take care of him a week any way, and two weeks
if I've got enough money in my bank and--and--"

"Mercy! mercy! mercy!" cried Mrs. Carruth, breaking into a laugh and
raising both hands as though to shield her head from the avalanche of
words descending upon it. Hadyn Stuyvesant strove manfully to keep his
countenance lest he wound the feelings of his little companion, but
the situation was too much for him and his genial laugh echoed Mrs.
Carruth's as he sprang from the depot wagon and raising his arms
toward the surprised child said:

"Let me lift you out little maid, and then I think perhaps you can
give your mother a clearer idea as to whether it is Jabe Raulsbury, or
old Baltie which is covered with mud and about to be curry-combed.
Mrs. Carruth, let me introduce myself as Hadyn Stuyvesant. I knew your
nephew when I was at college, and on the strength of my friendship for
him, must beg you to pardon this intrusion. I came upon your little
daughter not long since playing the part of the Good Samaritan to
Raulsbury's poor old horse. She had tackled a job just a little too
big for her, so I volunteered to lend a hand, and together we made it
go."

As he spoke Hadyn Stuyvesant removed his hat and ascended the piazza
steps with hand outstretched to the sweet-faced woman who stood at the
top. She took the extended hand, her face lighting with the winning
smile which carried sunshine to all who knew her, and in the present
instance fell with wonderful warmth upon the man before her, for
barely a year had passed since his mother had been laid away in a
beautiful cemetery in Switzerland, and the tie between that mother and
son had been a singularly tender one.

"I have often heard my nephew speak of you, Mr. Stuyvesant, and can
not think of you as a stranger. I regret that we have not met before,
but I understand you have lived abroad for several years. I am
indebted to you for bringing Jean safely home, but quite at a loss to
understand what has happened. Please come in and tell me. Will your
horse stand?"

"He will stand as long as I wish him to. But I fear I shall intrude
upon you?" and a questioning tone came into his voice.

"How could it be an intrusion under the circumstances? Come."

"In a moment, then. I must throw the blanket over Comet," and running
down the steps he took the blanket from the seat and quickly buckled
it upon the horse which meanwhile nosed him and nickered.

"Yes; it's all right, old man. Just you _stand_ till I want you," said
his master, giving the pretty head an affectionate pat which the horse
acknowledged by shaking it up and down two or three times. Hadyn
Stuyvesant then mounted the steps once more and followed Mrs. Carruth
and Jean into the house, across the broad hall into the cheerful
living-room where logs blazed upon the andirons in the fire-place, and
Constance was just lighting a large reading lamp which stood upon a
table in the center of the room.

"Constance, dear, this is Mr. Stuyvesant whom your cousin knew at
Princeton. My daughter, Constance, Mr. Stuyvesant. And this is my
eldest daughter, Eleanor," she added as Eleanor entered the room.
Constance set the lamp shade upon its rest and advanced toward their
guest with hand extended and a smile which was the perfect reflection
of her mother's. Eleanor's greeting although graceful and dignified
lacked her sister's cordiality.

"Now," added Mrs. Carruth, "let us be seated and learn more definitely
of Jean's escapade."

"But it _wasn't_ an escapade _this_ time, mother. It was just an
unhelpable experience, _wasn't_ it, Mr. Stuyvesant?" broke in Jean,
walking over to Hadyn Stuyvesant's side and placing her hand
confidingly upon his shoulder, as she peered into his kind eyes for
his corroboration of this assertion.

"_Entirely_ 'unhelpable,'" was the positive assurance as he put his
arm about her and drew her upon his knee. "Suppose you let me explain
it, and then your mother and sisters will understand the situation
fully," and in as few words as possible he gave an account of the
happenings of the past two hours, Jean now and again prompting him
when he went a trifle astray regarding the incidents which occurred
prior to his appearance upon the scene, and making a clean breast of
her attack upon Jabe Raulsbury. When _that_ point in the narration was
reached Mrs. Carruth let her hands drop resignedly into her lap;
Constance laughed outright, and Eleanor cried: "Oh, Mr. Stuyvesant,
what _must_ you think of Jean's training?"

Jean's eyes were fixed upon his as though in his reply rested the
verdict, and her fingers were clasped and unclasped nervously. It had
been more than two years since a man had set judgment upon her. Hadyn
Stuyvesant looked keenly into the big eyes looking so bravely and
frankly into his own, drew the little girl close to him, rested his
lips for a moment upon the silky curls and said:

"Sometimes we can hardly be held accountable for what we do;
especially when our sense of justice is sorely taxed. I believe I
should have done the same. But since you love horses so dearly, won't
you run and give Comet a lump of sugar? He has not had one to-day and
will feel slighted unless he gets it. Hold it upon the palm of your
hand and he will take it as gently as a kitten. Tell him I am coming
right away," and placing Jean upon the floor, he gave an encouraging
pat upon the brown curls.

"I'll give it to him right away, quick," she cried delightedly as she
ran from the room.

"Good!" Then rising he extended his hand, saying, as he clasped Mrs.
Carruth's:

"She is a little trump, Mrs. Carruth. Jove! if you could have been
there and seen her championship of that old horse, and her dauntless
courage when that old rascal, Jabe, bore down upon her, you would be
so set up that this house would have to expand to hold you. Please
don't reprove her. I ask it as favor, although I have no right to do
so. She has a fine spirit and a finer sense of duty, Mrs. Carruth, for
she gave me a rare call-down when I tested it by hinting that she'd
best keep mum on the subject if she was likely to come in for a
wigging. She is a great little lassie and I am going to ask you to let
me know her better."

"Jean is about right, _I_ think, Mr. Stuyvesant," said Constance, as
she shook hands good-bye. "She is peppery and impulsive, I know, but
it would be a hard matter to make her tell an untruth, or go against
what she considered her duty."

"I'm _sure_ of it, Miss Constance," was the hearty answer. "And now
good-bye. You will let me come again, Mrs. Carruth?"

"We will be very pleased to welcome you," was the cordial reply.

"Good! I'll come."




CHAPTER V

A New Member of the Family


"Has you-all done 'cided to do wid out yo' suppers dis yer night?
'Cause if you _is_ I 'spec's I kin clar away," was the autocratic
inquiry of Mammy Melviny as she stood in the doorway of the
living-room, her ample proportions very nearly filling it.

Hadyn Stuyvesant's call had been of longer duration than Mammy
approved, for her hot corn cakes were being rapidly ruined by the
delayed meal, and this was an outrage upon her skill in cooking. Mammy
had been Mrs. Carruth's nurse "down souf" and still regarded that
dignified lady as her "chile," and subject to her dictation. She was
the only servant which Mrs. Carruth now kept, the others having been
what Mammy stigmatized as "po' northern no 'count niggers" who gave
the minimum of work for the maximum of pay, and were prompt to take
their departure when adversity overtook their employer.

Not so Mammy. When the crisis came Mrs. Carruth stated the case to her
and advised her to seek another situation where she would receive the
wages her ability commanded, and which Mrs. Carruth, in her reduced
circumstances, could no longer afford to pay her. The storm which the
suggestion produced was both alarming and amusing. Placing her arms
upon her hips, and raising her head like a war-horse scenting battle,
Mammy stamped her foot and cried:

"Step down an' out? Get out 'en de fambly? Go wo'k fer some o' dese
hyer strange folks what aint keer a cent fo' me, an' aint know who I
_is_? _Me?_ a Blairsdale! Huh! What sort o' fool talk is _dat_, Baby?
Yo' cyant _git_ me out. Yo' need 'n ter try, kase 'taint gwine be no
good ter. I's hyer and hyer I's gwine _stay_, no matter _what_ come.
'Taint no use fer ter talk ter _me_ 'bout money and wages an' sich
truck. What I kerrin' fer dem? I'se got 'nough, an' ter spare. What
yo' t'ink I'se been doin' all dese years o' freedom? Flingin' my
earnin's 'way? Huh! You _know_ I aint done no sich foolishness. I'se
got a pile--yis, an' a _good_ pile too,--put 'way. I need n't ter ever
do a stroke mo' work long 's I live if I don't wantter. I'se _rich_, I
is. But I _gwine_ ter work jist 's long's I'se mind ter. Ain't I free?
Who gwine ter say I cyant wo'k? Now go long an' tend ter yo' business
and lemme lone ter tend ter mine, and dat's right down wid de pots and
de kettles, and de stew pans, an' de wash biler and de wash tubs, an'
I reckon I kin do more 'n six o' dese yer Norf niggers put togedder
when I set out ter good an' hard if I _is_ most sixty years old. Hush
yo' talk chile, an' don't let me ketch you a interferin' wid _my_
doin's agin. You heah _me_?" And at the end of this tirade, Mammy
turned sharply about and marched off like a grenadier. Mrs. Carruth
was deeply touched by the old woman's loyalty, but knowing the
antebellum negro as she did, she realized how wounded Mammy had been
by the suggestion that she seek a more lucrative situation among
strangers. Mammy had been born and raised a slave on Mrs. Carruth's
father's plantation in North Carolina, and would always consider
herself a member of Mrs. Carruth's family. Alas for the days of such
ties and such devotion!

So Mammy was now the autocrat of the household and ruled with an iron
hand, although woe to anyone who dared to overstep the bounds _she_
had established as her "Miss Jinny's" rights, or the "chillen's"
privileges as "old marster's gran'-chillern." "Old Marster" was
Mammy's ideal of what a gentleman should be, and "de days befo' de
gre't turmoil" were the only days "fitten for _folks_ (always to be
written in italics) to live in."

She was an interesting figure as she stood in the doorway, and snapped
out her question, although her old face, surmounted by its gay
bandanna turban was the personification of kindliness, and her keen
eyes held only love for her "white folks."

She was decidedly corpulent and her light print gown and beautifully
ironed white apron stood out from her figure until they completely
filled the doorway.

Mrs. Carruth turned toward her and asked with a quizzical smile;

"What is spoiling, Mammy?"

"Huh! Ain't nuffin spilin's I knows on, but dat Miss Nornie done say
she ain't had no co'n cakes 'n 'bout 'n age an' if she _want_ 'em so
turrible she'd better come and _eat_ 'em,"--and with a decisive nod
Mammy stalked off toward the dining-room.

"Come, girls, unless you want to evoke the displeasure of the
presiding genius of the household," said Mrs. Carruth smiling, as she
led the way in Mammy's wake.

It was a pleasant meal, for Mammy would not countenance the least
lapse from the customs of earlier days, and the same pains were taken
for the simple meals now served as had been taken with the more
elaborate ones during Mr. Carruth's lifetime. The linen must be ironed
with the same care; the silver must shine as brightly, and the glass
sparkle as it had always done. Miss Jinny must not miss any of the
luxuries to which she had been born if Mammy could help it.

"Isn't he splendid, mother?" asked Jean, as she buttered her third
corn cake. "He was _so_ good to Baltie and to me."

"I am very glad to know him, dear, for Lyman was much attached to
him."

"Where has he been all these years, mother, that we have never met him
in Riveredge?" asked Eleanor.

"He has lived abroad when not at college. He took his degree last
spring. His mother died there a little more than a year ago, I
understand. She never recovered from the blow of his father's death
when Hadyn was about fifteen years of age. She went abroad soon after
for her health and never came back. He came over for his college
course at Princeton, but always rejoined her during his holidays."

"How old a man is he, mother? He seems both young and old," said
Constance.

"I am not sure, but think he must be about Lyman's age--nearly
twenty-four. But the Society seems to have made a wise choice in
electing him its president; he has certainly taken energetic measures
in this case and I am glad that he has, for it is disgraceful to have
such a thing occur in Riveredge. Poor old horse! It would have been
more merciful to shoot him. How could Jabe Raulsbury have been so
utterly heartless?"

"But, mother, suppose no one will take old Baltie and give him a
home?" persisted Jean, "will he _have_ to be shot then?"

"Would it not be kinder to end such a hapless existence than to leave
it to an uncertain fate, dear?" asked Mrs. Carruth gently.

"Well, maybe, but _I_ don't want him killed. He _loves_ me," was
Jean's answer and the little upraising of the head at the conclusion
of the remark conveyed more to Constance than to the others. Constance
understood Jean better than any other member of the family, and during
the summer just passed Jean had many times gone to the field in which
Baltie was pastured to carry some dainty to the poor old horse and her
love for him and compassion for his wretchedness were deep.

No more was said just then, but Constance knew that the subject had
not passed from Jean's thoughts and one afternoon, exactly two weeks
from that evening, this was verified.

Mrs. Carruth had gone to sit with a sick friend. Eleanor was in her
room lost to everything but a knotty problem for Monday's recitation,
and Mammy was busily occupied with some dainty dish against her Miss
Jinny's home-coming. Constance was laying the tea-table when the
crunch-crunch, crunch-crunch, upon the gravel of the driveway caused
her to look up, there to behold Jean with old Baltie in tow.

"Merciful powers, what _has_ the child done now?" she exclaimed as she
let fall with a clatter the knife and fork she was about to place upon
the table and flew to the front door, crying as she hastily opened it:
"Jean Carruth what in this world _have_ you been doing?"

"I've brought him home. I _had_ to. I went down to ask Mr. Pringle if
anybody had come to take him, but he wasn't there. There wasn't
_any_body there but old deaf Mike who cleans the stable and I couldn't
make _him_ understand a single thing I said. He just mumbled and
wagged his head for all the world like that China mandarin in the
library, and didn't do a thing though I yelled at him as hard as I
could."

"But _how_ did you get Baltie and, greater marvel, _how_ did you bring
him all this way home?" persisted Constance, bound to get to the
bottom of facts.

"I went into the box-stall--it's close to the door you know--and got him
and led him here."

"But where was Mike, and what was he doing all that time to _let_ you
do such a thing?"

"O, he went poking off down the stable and didn't pay any attention to
me. It wouldn't have made any difference if he _had_; I had gone there
to rescue Baltie and save him from being shot, and I didn't mean to
come away without doing it. The two weeks were up to-day and he was
_there_. If any one had been found to take him he _wouldn't_ have been
there yet, would he? So _that_ settled it, and I wasn't going to take
any chances. If I'd let him stay one day longer they might have shot
him. If I could have found Mr. Pringle I'd have told him, but I
couldn't, and I didn't dare to wait. I left my bank money, almost five
dollars, to pay for this week's board--Mr. Stuyvesant said it would be
enough--and a little note to tell him it was for Baltie; I wrote it on
a piece of paper in his office, and then I came home as fast as Baltie
could walk, and here we are."

Jean had talked very rapidly and Constance was too dumfounded for the
time being, to interrupt the flow of words. Presently however, she
recovered her speech and, resting one hand on Baltie's withers and the
other on Jean's shoulder, asked resignedly:

"And now that you've got him, may I ask what in this world you propose
to _do_ with him?"

"Take him out to the stable of course and take care of him as long as
he lives," was the uncontrovertible reply.

"Mother will _never_ let you do such a thing, Jean, and he must be
taken back to Pringle's at once," said Constance, with more emphasis
than usually entered her speech toward this mad-cap little sister.

"I won't! I won't! I _won't_ let him go back!" broke out Jean, a storm
of sobs ending the protest and bringing Mammy upon the scene hot-foot,
for Mammy's ears were keen for notes of woe from her baby.

"What's de matter, honey? What done happen ter yo'?" she cried as she
came hurrying across the little porch upon which the dining-room
opened. "Bress Gawd what yo' got dere, chile? Huccum dat old horse
here?"

"Oh Mammy, Mammy, its Baltie, and she says I can't keep him, and they
are going to _kill_ him, 'cause he's old and blind and hasn't anyone
to take care of him. And Mammy, Mammy, _please_ don't let 'em 'cause I
_love_ him. I do, I do, Mammy," cried Jean as she cast Baltie's leader
from her and rushed to Mammy, to fling herself into those protecting
arms and sob out her woes.

"Wha', wha', wha', yo' say, Baby?" stammered Mammy, whose tongue
sometimes became unruly under great excitement. "Somebody gwine tek
away dat old horse dat yo' love, an' breck yo' heart? Huh! Who gwine
do dat when Mammy stan' by? I like 'er _see_ 'em do it! _Co'se_ I
knows Baltie. Ain' I seen him dese many years? An' yo' gwine pertec'
him an' keer fer him in his discrepancy? Well, ef yo' wantter yo'
_shall_, an' dat's all 'bout it."

"But Mammy, Mammy, she can't; she mustn't; what will mother say?"
remonstrated Constance smiling in spite of herself at the ridiculous
situation for Mammy had promptly put on her war-paint, and was a
formidable champion to overcome.

"An' what yo' _ma_ gotter say 'bout it if _I_ sets out ter tak' care
of an' old horse? 'Taint _her_ horse. _She_ aint got nothin' 'tall ter
_do wid_ him. He's been a lookin', an' a waitin'; and de Lawd knows
but he's been _a-prayin'_ fer a pertecter----how _we-all_ gwine know he
aint _prayed_ ter de Lawd fer ter raise one up fer him in his mis'ry?
An' now he's _got_ one an' it's _me_ an' dis chile. Go 'long an' set
yo' table an' let us 'lone. Come on honey; we'll take old Baltie out
yonder ter de stable an' bed him _down_ an' feed him _up_ twell he so
sot up he like 'nough bus' wid pride, an' I just like ter see who
gwine _stop_ us. Hi yah-yah, yah," and Mammy's wrath ended in a
melodious laugh as she caught hold of the leader and stalked off with
this extraordinary addition to her already manifold duties, Jean
holding her free hand and nodding exultingly over her shoulder at
Constance who had collapsed upon the lower step.




CHAPTER VI

Blue Monday


October, with its wealth of color, its mellow days, and soft haze was
passing quickly and November was not far off: November with its
"melancholy days" of "wailing winds and wintry woods."

Baltie had now been a member of the Carruth family for nearly a month
and had improved wonderfully under Mammy Melviny's care. How the old
woman found time to care for him and the means to provide for him was
a source of wonder not only to Mrs. Carruth, but to the entire
neighborhood who regarded the whole thing as a huge joke, and enjoyed
many a hearty laugh over it, for Mammy was considered a character by
the neighbors, and nobody felt much surprised at any new departure in
which she might elect to indulge. Two or three friends had begged Mrs.
Carruth to let them relieve her of the care of the old horse, assuring
her that they would gladly keep him in their stables as long as he
needed a home, and ended in a hearty laugh at the thought of Mammy
turning groom. But when Mrs. Carruth broached the subject to Mammy she
was met with flat opposition:

"Send dat ole horse off ter folks what was jist gwine tek keer of him
fer cha'ity? _No_ I aint gwine do no sich t'ing. De Lawd sartin sent
him ter me ter tek keer of an' I'se gwin ter _do_ it. Aint he mine?
Didn't Jabe Raulsbury say dat anybody what would tek keer of him could
_have_ him? Well I'se tekin' keer of him so _co'se_ he's _mine_. I
aint never is own no live stock befo' an now I _got_ some. Go 'long,
Miss Jinny; you'se got plenty ter tend ter 'thout studyin' 'bout my
_horse_. Bimeby like 'nough I have him so fed up and spry I can sell
him fer heap er cash--dough I don' believe anybody's got nigh 'nough
fer ter buy him whilst Baby loves him."

And so the discussion ended and Baltie lived upon the fat of the land
and was sheltered in Mrs. Carruth's unused stable. Dry leaves which
fell in red and yellow clouds from the maple, birch and oak trees made
a far softer bed than the old horse had known in many a day. A bag of
bran was delivered at Mrs. Carruth's house for "Mammy Melviny," with
Hadyn Stuyvesant's compliments. Mammy herself, invested in a sack of
oats and a bale of cut hay, to say nothing of saving all bits of bread
and parings from her kitchen, and Baltic waxed sleek and fat thereon.
Jean was his devoted slave and daily led him about the grounds for a
constitutional. Up and down the driveway paced the little girl, the
old horse plodding gently beside her, his ears pricked toward her for
her faintest word, his head held in the pathetic, listening attitude
of a blind horse. He knew her step afar off, and his soft nicker never
failed to welcome her as she drew near. To no one else did he show
such little affectionate ways, or manifest such gentleness. He seemed
to understand that to this little child, which one stroke of his great
hoofs could have crushed, he owed his rescue and present comforts.

And so the weeks had slipped away. The money which Jean had left for
Mr. Pringle had been promptly refunded with a note to explain that the
Society had borne all the expenses for Baltie's board.

Mrs. Carruth sat in her library wrinkling her usually serene brow over
a business letter this chilly Monday morning, and hurrying to get it
completed before the arrival of the letter carrier who always took any
letters to be mailed. Her face wore a perplexed expression, and her
eyes had tired lines about them, for the past year had been harder for
her than anyone suspected. Her income, at best, was much too limited
to conduct her home as it had always been conducted, and the general
expenses of living in Riveredge were steadily increasing. True, Mammy
was frugality itself in the matter of providing, and Mrs. Carruth
often marveled at the small amounts of her weekly bills. But the
demands in other directions were heavy, and the expenses of the place
itself were large. More than once had she questioned the wisdom of
striving to keep the home, believing that the tax upon her resources,
and her anxiety, would be less if she gave it up and removed to town
where she could live for far less than in Riveredge. Then arose the
memory of the building of the home, the hopes, the plans, and the joys
so inseparable from it, the children's well-being and their love for
the house their father had built; their education, and the environment
of a home in such a town as Riveredge.

Now, however, new difficulties were confronting her, for some of her
investments were not making the returns she had expected and her
income was seriously affected. In spite of the utmost frugality and
care the outlook was not encouraging, and just now she had to meet the
demand of the fire insurance upon the home and its contents, and just
how to do so was the question which was causing her brows to wrinkle.
She had let the matter stand until the last moment, but dared to do so
no longer for upon that point Mr. Carruth had always been most
emphatic; the insurance upon his property must never lapse. He had
always carried one, and since his death his wife had been careful to
continue it. But _now_ how to meet the sum, and meet it at once, was
the problem.

She had completed her letter when Mammy came to the door.

"Is yo' here, Miss Jinny? Is yo' busy? I wants to ax you sumpin'," she
said as she gave a quick glance at Mrs. Carruth from her keen eyes.

"Come in, Mammy. What is it?"

The voice had a tired, anxious note in it which Mammy was quick to
catch.

"Wha' de matter, honey? Wha's plaguin' you dis mawnin'?" she asked as
she hurried across the room to rest her hand on her mistress'
shoulder.

Like a weary child Mrs. Carruth let her head fall upon Mammy's bosom--a
resting place that as long as she could remember had never failed
her--as she said:

"Mammy, your baby is very weary, and sorely disheartened this morning,
and very, very lonely."

The words ended in a sob.

Instantly all Mammy's sympathies were aroused. Gathering the weary
head in her arms she stroked back the hair with her work-hardened
hand, as she said in the same tender tones she had used to soothe her
baby more than forty years ago:

"Dere, dere, honey, don' yo' fret; don' yo' fret. Tell Mammy jist
what's pesterin' yo' an' she'll mak' it all right fer her baby. Hush!
Hush. Mammy can tek keer of anythin'."

"Oh, Mammy dear, dear old Mammy, you take care of so much as it is.
What _would_ we do without you?"

"Hush yo' talk chile! What I gwine do widout yo' all? Dat talk all
foolishness. Don't I b'long ter de fambly? Now yo' mind yo' Mammy an'
tell her right off what's a frettin' yo' dis day. Yo' heah _me_?"

Mammy's voice was full of forty-five years of authority, but her eyes
were full of sympathetic tears, for her love for her "Miss Jinny" was
beyond the expression of words.

"O Mammy, I am so foolish, and I fear so pitifully weak when it comes
to conducting my business affairs wisely. You can't understand these
vexatious business matters which I must attend to, but I sorely miss
Mr. Carruth when they arise and _must_ be met."

"Huccum I cyan't understand 'em? What Massa Bernard done tackle in his
business dat I cyan't ef _yo'_ kin? Tell me dis minute just what you'
gotter do, an' I bate yo' ten dollars I c'n _do_ it."

"I know there isn't anything you would not try to do, Mammy, from
taking care of an old horse, to moving the contents of the entire
house if it became necessary," replied Mrs. Carruth, smiling in spite
of herself, as she wiped her eyes, little realizing how near the truth
was her concluding remark regarding Mammy's prowess.

"I reckon I c'd move de hull house if I had _time_ enough, an' as fer
de horse--huh! ain't he stanin' dere a livin' tes'imony of what a
bran-smash an' elbow-grease kin do? 'Pears lak his hairs rise right up
an' call me bres-sed, dey's tekin' ter shinin' so sense I done rub my
hans ober 'em," and Mammy, true to her racial characteristics, broke
into a hearty laugh; so close together lies the capacity for joy or
sorrow in this child race. The next instant, however, Mammy was all
seriousness as she demanded:

"Now I want yo' ter tell me all 'bout dis bisness flummy-diddle what's
frettin' yo'. Come now; out wid it, quick."

Was it the old habit of obedience to Mammy's dictates, or the woman's
longing for someone to confide in during these trying days of
loneliness, that impelled Mrs. Carruth to explain in as simple
language as possible the difficulties encompassing her?

The burden of meeting even the ordinary every-day expenses upon the
very limited income derived from Mr. Carruth's life insurance, which
left no margin whatsoever for emergencies. Of the imperative necessity
of continuing the fire insurance he had always carried upon the home
and its contents, lest a few hours wipe out what it had required years
to gather together, and his wife and children be left homeless. How,
under their altered circumstances this seemed more than ever
imperative, since in the event of losing the house and its contents
there would be no possible way of replacing either unless they kept
the insurance upon them paid up.

Mammy listened intently, now and again nodding her old head and
uttering a Um-uh! Um-uh! of comprehension.

When Mrs. Carruth ceased speaking she asked:

"An' how much has yo' gotter plank right out dis minit fer ter keep
dis hyer as'sur'nce f'om collaps'in', honey?"

"Nearly thirty dollars, Mammy, and that seems a very large sum to me
now-a-days."

"Hum-uh! Yas'm. So it do. Um. An' yo' aint got it?"

"I have not got it to-day, Mammy. I shall have it next week, but the
time expires day after to-morrow and I do not know whether the company
will be willing to wait, or whether I should forfeit my claim by the
delay. I have written to ask."

"Huh! Wha' sort o' compiny is it dat wouldn't trus' a _Blairsdale_, I
like ter know?" demanded Mammy indignantly.

Mrs. Carruth smiled sadly as she answered:

"These are not the old days, Mammy, and you know 'corporations have no
souls.'"

"No so'les? Huh, _I'se_ seen many a corpo'ration dat hatter have good
thick _leather_ soles fer ter tote 'em round. Well, well, times is
sho' 'nough changed an' dese hyer Norf ways don't set well on my bile;
dey rises it, fer sure. So dey ain't gwine _trus'_ you, Baby? Where
dey live at who has de sesso 'bout it all?"

"The main office is in the city, Mammy, but they have, of course, a
local agent here."

"Wha' yo' mean by a locum agen', honey?"

"A clerk who has an office at 60 State street, and who attends to any
business the firm may have in Riveredge."

"Is yo' writ yo' letter ter him? Who _is_ he?"

"No, I have written to the New York office, because Mr. Carruth always
transacted his business there. I thought it wiser to, for this Mr.
Sniffins is a very young man, and would probably not be prepared to
answer my question."

"Wha' yo' call him? Yo' don' mean dat little swimbly, red-headed,
white-eyed sumpin' nu'er what sets down in dat basemen' office wid his
foots cocked up on de rail-fence in front ob him, an' a segyar mos' as
big as his laig stuck in he's mouf all de time? I sees _him_ eve'y
time I goes ter market, an' he lak' ter mek me sick. Is _he_ de
agen'?"

"Yes, Mammy, and I dare say he is capable enough, although I do not
care to come in contact with him if I can avoid it."

"If I ketches yo' in dat 'tater sprout's office I gwine smack yo'
sure's yo' bo'n. Yo' heah _me_? Why _his_ ma keeps the _sody_-fountain
on Main street. Wha-fo you gotter do wid such folks, Baby?"

"But, Mammy, they are worthy, respectable people,"--protested Mrs.
Carruth.

"Hush yo' talk, chile. _I_ reckon I knows de diff'rence twixt quality
an' de _yether_ kind. Dat's no place fer yo' to go at," cried Mammy,
all her instincts rebelling against the experiences her baby was
forced to meet in her altered circumstances. "Gimme dat letter. I'se
gwine straight off ter markit dis minit and I'll see dat it get sont
off ter de right pusson 'for I'se done anudder ting."

"But what did you wish to ask me, Mammy?"

"Nuffin'. 'Taint no 'count 'tall. I'll ax it when I comes back. Go
'long up-stairs and mek yo' bed if yo pinin' for occerpation," and
away Mammy flounced from the room, leaving Mrs. Carruth more or less
bewildered. She would have been completely so could she have followed
the old woman.




CHAPTER VII

Mammy Generalissimo


Half an hour later a short, stout colored woman in neat, print gown,
immaculate white apron, gorgeous headkerchief and gray plaid shawl,
entered the office of the Red Star Fire Insurance Company, at No. 60
State street, and walking up to the little railing which divided from
the vulgar herd the sacred precincts of Mr. Elijah Sniffins,
representative, rested her hand upon the small swinging gate as she
nodded her head slightly and asked:

"Is yo' Mister Sniffins, de locum agen' fer de Fire Insur'nce
Comp'ny?"

"I am," replied that gentleman,--without removing from between his
teeth the huge cigar upon which he was puffing until he resembled a
small-sized locomotive, or changing his position--"Mr. Elijah Sniffins,
representative of the Red Star Insurance Company. Are you thinkin' of
taking out a policy?" concluded that gentleman with a supercilious
smirk.

Mammy's eyes narrowed slightly and her lips were compressed for a
moment.

"No, sir, I don' reckon I is studyin' 'bout takin' out no pol'cy. I
jist done come hyer on a little private bisness wid yo'."

Mammy paused, somewhat at a loss how to proceed, for business affairs
seemed very complicated to her. Mr. Elijah Sniffins was greatly amused
and continued to eye her and smile. He was a dapper youth of probably
twenty summers, with scant blond hair, pale blue, shifty eyes, a weak
mouth surmounted by a cherished mustache of numerable hairs and a chin
which stamped him the toy of stronger wills. Mammy knew the type and
loathed it. His smirk enraged her, and rage restored her
self-possession. Raising her head with a little sidewise jerk as
befitted the assurance of a Blairsdale, she cried:

"Yas--sir, I done come to ax yo' a question 'bout de 'surance on a
place in Riveredge. I hears de time fer settlin' up gwine come day
atter to-morrer an' if 'taint settled up de 'surance boun' ter
collapse. Is dat so?"

"Unless the policy is renewed it certainly _will_ 'collapse,'" replied
Mr. Sniffins breaking into an amused laugh.

"Huh! 'Pears like yo' find it mighty 'musin'," was Mammy's next remark
and had Mr. Elijah Sniffins been a little better acquainted with his
patron he would have been wise enough to take warning from her tone.

"Well, you see I am not often favored with visits from ladies of your
color who carry fire insurance policies. A good many carry _life_
insurance, but as a rule they don't insure their estates against
_fire_, an' the situation was so novel that it amused me a little. No
offense meant."

"An' none teken--from _your_ sort," retorted Mammy. "But how 'bout dis
hyer pol'cy? What I gotter do fer ter keep it f'om collapsin' ef it
aint paid by day atter to-morrer?"

"Pay it _to-day, or_ to-morrow," was the suave reply accompanied by a
wave of the hand to indicate the ultimatum.

"'Spose dey ain't got de money fer ter pay right plank down, but kin
pay de week atter? Could'n' de collapse be hild up twell den?"

"Ha! Ha!" laughed Mr. Elijah. "I'm 'fraid not; I've heard of those
'next week' settlements before, and experience tells me that 'next
week' aint never arrived yet. Ha! Ha!"

"Den yo' won't trus' de Ca-- de fambly?" Mammy had very nearly betrayed
herself.

"Well, if it was the Rogers, or the Wellmans, or the Stuyvesants, or
some of them big bugs up yonder on the hill, that everybody knows has
got piles of money, and that everybody knows might let the policy
lapse just because it had slipped their memory--why, that 'd be a
different matter. We'd know down in this here office that it was just
an oversight, yer see; not a busted bank account. So, of course, we'd
make concessions; just jog 'em up a little and a check 'd come 'long
all O.K. and no fuss. But these small policies--why--well, I've got ter
be more careful of the company's interests; I hold a responsible
position here."

"De good Lawd, yo' don' sesso!" exclaimed Mammy, turning around and
around to scrutinize every corner of the tiny office, and then letting
her eyes rest upon the being whose sense of responsibility was
apparently crushing him down upon his chair, if one could judge from
his semi-recumbent position. "Dat's shore 'nough a pity. Look lak it
mought be mos' too much fer yo'. Don' seem right fer a comp'ny ter put
sich a boy as yo' is in sich a 'sponsible 'sition, do it now?"

Mammy's expression was solicitude personified. Mr. Elijah Sniffins'
face became a delicate rose color, and his feet landed upon the floor
with emphasis as he straightened in his chair, and dragged nervously
at the infinitesimal mustache, meanwhile eying Mammy with some
misgivings.

Mammy continued to smile upon him benignly, and her smile proved as
disconcerting as she meant it should. She resolved to have her innings
with the smug youth who had begun by slighting her race and ended by
doing far worse; failing to class the Carruths among those whom
everyone trusted as a matter of course. The former slight might have
been disregarded; the latter? _Never._ Consequently Mammy had
instantly decided "ter mak' dat little no'count sumpin 'er ner'er
squirm jist fer ter te'ch him what's due de quality," and the process
had begun.

Poor Mammy! She would never learn that in the northern world where her
lot was now cast the almighty dollar was king, queen and court
combined. That its possession could carry into high places bad
manners, low birth, aye actual rascality and hold them up to the
shallow as enviable things when veneered with golden luster. That "de
quality" without that dazzling reflector were very liable to be cast
aside as of no value, as the nugget of virgin gold might be tramped
upon and its worth never suspected by the unenlightened in their
eagerness to reach a shining bit of polished brass farther along the
path.

But Mammy's traditions were deeply rooted.

"I think I can take care of the position. What can I do for you? My
time is valuable," snapped Mr. Elijah Sniffins, rising from his chair
and coming close to the dividing railing, as a hint to Mammy to
conclude her business.

"De Lawd er massy! Is dat so? Now I ain't never is 'spitioned dat f'om
de looks ob t'ings. 'Pears lak yo' got a sight o' time on han'. Wal I
'clar fo' it I do'n un'nerstan' dese hyer bisness places no how. Well!
Well! So yo' want me fer ter state mine an' cl'ar long out, does yo'
Mr. 'Lijah? 'Lijah; _'Lijah_. Was yo' ma a studyin' 'bout yo' doin's
when she done giv' yo' dat name? Sort o' fits yo' pine blank, don' it
now? Like 'nuf de cha'iot 'll come kitin' 'long one o' dese hyer days
an' hike yo' inter de high places. Yah! Yah!" and Mammy's mellow laugh
filled the office.

"See here, old woman, if you've got some little picayune payment to
make, _make_ it and clear out. I ain't got time ter stand here talkin'
ter niggers," cried the agent, his temper taking final flight.

Mammy eyed him steadily as she said:

"Wall _dis yere_ time yo's gwine deal wid a nigger, an' yo's gwine do
lak _she say_. Dis yere comp'ny 'sures de Carruth house an' eve'y last
t'ing what's inside it, an' de policy yo' say 's gotter be settled up
when it's gotter be, or de hul t'ing 'll collapse? Now Miss Jinny
ain't never _is_ had no dealin's wid _yo'_, case I don' _let_ her have
dealin's wid no white trash--_I_ handles _dat_ sort when it has ter be
handled--an' I keeps jist as far f'om it as ever I kin _while_ I
handles it. But I'se gotter settle up dis policy fer de fambly so what
is it? How much is I gotter pay yo'?"

The varying expressions passing over Mr. Sniffins' countenance during
Mammy's speech would have delighted an artist.

"What er? What er? What er you telling me?" he stammered.

"De ain't no 'watter' 'bout it; it's _fire_, an' I done come ter
settle up," asserted Mammy.

"Have you brought the necessary papers with you? Have we a record in
this office?"

"Don' know nuffin' 'tall 'bout no papers nor no records. Jist knows
dat Miss Jinny's insured fer $15,000," said Mammy, causing the youth
confronting her to open his eyes. "Dis hyer letter what she done wrote
dis mawn'in tells all 'bout it I 'spec'. She tol' me pos' it ter de
comp'ny an' I reckons _yo'll_ do fer de comp'ny _dis_ time when de
time's pressin' an' der ain't nuffin' _better_ ter han'."

The contempt in Mammy's tone was tangible, as she held the letter as
far from her as possible. Mr. Sniffins took it, noted the address and
broke the seal. When he had read the letter he said with no little
triumph in his voice:

"But in this letter Mrs. Carruth says distinctly that she is not
prepared to pay the sum which falls due day after to-morrow, and asks
for an extension of time. I am not prepared to make this extension.
_That's_ up to the company," and he held the letter toward Mammy as
though he washed his hands of the whole affair.

Mammy did not take it. Instead she said very much as she would have
spoken to a refractory child who was not quite sure of what he could
or could _not_ do: "La Honey, don' yo' 'spose I sensed _dat_ long go?
Co'se I knows _yo'_ cyant do nuffin' much; yo's only a lil' boy, an'
der cyant no boy do a man's wo'k. Yo's hyer fer ter tek in de _cash_,
an' so _dat's_ what I done come ter pay. Miss Jinny she done mek up
her mine dat she better pay dat policy dan use de money fer
frolic'in'. I reckons yo' can tek cyer of it an' sen' it long down
yonder whar de big comp'ny 's at. Dat's all I want _yo'_ ter do, so
now go 'long an' git busy an' _do_ it. _Dere's_ thirty dollars; count
it so's yo's suah. Den write it all out crost de back ob Miss Jinny's
letter so's I have sumpin fer ter show dat it's done paid."

"But I'll give you a regular receipt for the amount," said the clerk,
now eager to serve a customer whose premium represented so large a
policy.

"Yo' kin give me dat too if yo' wantter, but I wants de sign on de
letter too, an' yo' full name, Mr. Elijah Sniffins, ter boot, you
knows what yo' jist done said 'bout trus'in' folks, an' _yo'_ don'
berlong ter de Rogersers, ner de Wellmans, ner de Stuyvesants, but _I_
berlongs ter de _Blairsdales_!"

Mammy grew nearly three inches taller as she made this statement,
while her hearer seemed to grow visibly shorter. The receipt was duly
filled out, likewise an acknowledgment written upon the blank side of
Mrs. Carruth's letter and Elijah Sniffins' name signed thereto. Mammy
took them scrutinized both with great care (she could not read one
word) nodded and said:

"Huh, Um. Yas, sir. I reckon _dat_ all squar'. If de house burn down
ter night _we_ all gwine git de 'surance sure 'nough. Yas--yas."

"You certainly could collect whatever was comin' to you," Mr. Sniffins
assured her, his late supercilious smile replaced by a most obsequious
one for this representative of the possessors of the dollars he
worshiped. Mr. Sniffins meant to have a good many dollars himself some
day and the luxuries which dollars stand for.

Mammy nodded, and placing the receipt and letter in her bag gave a
slight nod and turned to leave the office. Mr. Sniffins hurried to
open the door for her. As she was about to cross the threshold she
paused, eyed him keenly from the crown of his smoothly brushed head to
his patent-leather-shod feet and then asked:

"Huccum yo' opens de do' fer niggers? Ef yo' b'longed ter de quality
yo'd let de niggers open de do's fer _yo_. Yo' better run 'long an'
ten' yo' ma's sody foun'in 'twell yo' learns de quality manners."

An hour later Mammy was busy in her kitchen, the receipts safely
pinned within her bodice and no one the wiser for the morning's
business transaction.




CHAPTER VIII

Chemical Experiments


"Eleanor! Eleanor! where are you?" cried Constance at the foot of the
third-story stairs the following day after luncheon.

Blue Monday had passed with its dull gray clouds and chill winds to
give place to one of those rare, warm days which sometimes come to us
late in October, as though the glorious autumn were loath to depart
and had turned back for a last smile upon the land it loved.

The great river lay like shimmering liquid gold, the air was filled
with the warm, pungent odors of the late autumn woods, and a soft haze
rested upon the opposite hills.

"Here in my room," answered Eleanor. "What is it? What do you want? I
can't come just this minute. Come up if it's important." The voice was
somewhat muffled as though the speaker's head were covered.

Constance bounded up the stairs, hurried across the hall and entered
the large third-story front room which Eleanor occupied. There was no
sign of its occupant.

"More experiments I dare say," she murmured as she entered, crossed
the room and pushed open the door leading into a small adjoining room
whereupon her nostrils were assailed by odors _not_ of Araby--the
blessed.

"Phew! Ugh! What an awful smell! What under the sun are you doing? If
you don't blow yourself to glory some day I shall be thankful," she
ended as she pinched her nostrils together.

"Shut the door quick and don't let the smell get through the house or
mother will go crazy when she gets home. Yes, it _is_ pretty bad, but
tie your handkerchief over your nose and then you won't mind it so
much. As for blowing myself to glory, perhaps that will be my only way
of ever coming by any, so I ought to be willing to take that route.
But what do you want?" concluded Eleanor, pouring one smelly chemical
into a small glass which contained another, whereupon it instantly
became a most exquisite shade of crimson.

Constance watched her closely without speaking. Presently she said:

"Well I dare say it is 'everyone to her fancy,' as the old lady said
when she kissed her cow (Jean could appreciate that, couldn't she? She
kisses Baltie often enough) but _I'd_ rather be excused when chemical
experiments are in order. Don't for the life of me understand how you
endure the smells and the mess. What is _that_ horrid looking thing
over there?" and Constance pointed to a grewsome-looking object
stretched upon a small glass table at the farther side of the room.

"My rabbit. I got it at the school laboratory and I've been examining
its respiratory organs. They're perfectly wonderful, Constance. Want
to see them? I'll be done with this in just a minute."

"_No I don't!_" was the empathic negative. "I dare say it's all very
wonderful and interesting and I ought to know all about breathing
apparatus----_es_, or apparatti, or whatever the plural of our wind-pump
machine _is_, but if I've got to learn by hashing up animals I'll
never, _never_ know, and that's all there is about it. I'll take my
knowledge on theory or supposition or whatever you call it. But I've
nearly forgotten to tell you the news. I've had a letter from Mrs.
Hadyn, Mr. Stuyvesant's aunt, the one he is named for you know, asking
me to help at the candy counter at the Memorial Hospital Fair, week
after next, and, incidentally, contribute some of my 'delicious
pralines and nut fudge'--that's in quotes remember,--and remain for the
dance which will follow after ten-thirty on the closing evening. She
will see that I reach home safely. How is _that_ for a frolic? I've
been wild for a dance the past month."

"Is mother willing? What will you wear?" was the essentially feminine
inquiry which proved that Eleanor, even though absorbed in her
sciences and isms, was a woman at heart.

"What is the use of asking that? You know I've got to wear whatever is
on hand to be utilized into gay and festive attire. I can't indulge in
new frocks now-a-days when the finances are at such a low ebb. Need
all we've got for necessities without thinking of spending money for
notions. But I'll blossom out gloriously; see if I don't. That was one
reason I came up to talk to you. Can you tear yourself away from your
messes long enough to come up to the attic with me? I've been wanting
to rummage for days, but haven't been able to get around to it. So
tidy up, and come along. You've absorbed enough knowledge to last you
for one while."

Eleanor wavered a moment and then began to put aside her materials,
and a few moments later the two girls were up in the attic.

"Do you know what I believe I'll do?" said Constance, after a half
hour's rummaging among several trunks had brought forth a perplexing
array of old finery, winter garments and outgrown apparel. "I believe
I'll just cart down every solitary dud we've got here and have them
all aired. I heard mother say last week that they ought to be, and she
would have it done the first clear, dry day, and this one is simply
heavenly. Come on; take an armful and get busy. They smell almost as
abominably from tar camphor as your laboratory smells of chemicals."

"Think I'd rather have the chemicals if my choice were consulted,"
laughed Eleanor as obedient to instructions, she gathered up an armful
of clothing and prepared to descend the stairs.

"Thanks, I'll take the tar. Go on; I'll follow."

Little was to be seen of either girl as she moved slowly down the
stairs. At the foot stood Mammy.

"Fo' de Lawd sake wha' yo' chillen at _now_?" she demanded as she
stood barring their progress.

"Bringing out our winter wardrobes, Mammy. Good deal of it as to
quantity; what it will turn out as to quality remains to be seen,"
cried Constance cheerily.

"Lak' 'nough mos' anyt'ing if yo' had de handlin' ob it. Yo' sartin'
_is_ de banginest chile wid yo' han's," was Mammy's flattering reply.

"Perhaps if I could 'bang' as well with my brains as with my hands I
might amount to something, Mammy. But Nornie has all the brains of the
family. _She_'ll make our fame and fortune some day; see if she
doesn't."

"Guess I'll have to do something clever then if I am to become famous
in _this_ day and age," said Eleanor, as she made her way past Mammy.
"Thus far I haven't given very noble promise."

"Who sesso?" demanded Mammy. "Ain' yo' de fust and fo'most up dere
whar de school's at? What fur ole Miss sendin' yo' dar fer den? Huh, I
reckon _she_ know whar ter spen' her money, an' Gawd knows she ain'
spendin' none what ain' gwine ter pintedly make up fer all she gin
out. _She_ no fool, I tell yo'."

The girls broke into peals of laughter, for Mammy's estimation of "ol'
Miss," as she called Mr. Carruth's aunt by marriage, was a pretty
accurate one, "Aunt Eleanor" being a lady who had very pronounced
ideas and no hesitation whatever in giving expression to them, as well
as a very strong will to back them up. She also had a pretty liberally
supplied purse, the supply being drawn from a large estate which she
had inherited from her father, a Central New York farmer, who had made
a fortune in fruit-growing and ended his days in affluence, although
he had begun them in poverty. She had no children, her only son having
died when a child, and her husband soon afterward. Bernard Carruth had
always been a favorite with her, although she never forgave him for
what she pronounced his "utter and imbecilic folly." It was Aunt
Eleanor who made the seminary possible for the niece who had been
named for her; a compliment which flattered the old lady more than she
chose to let others suspect, for the niece was manifesting a fine
mind, and the aunt had secretly resolved to do not a little toward its
development although she took pains to guard the fact.

"Go along up-stairs and get an armful of things, Mammy. That will keep
you from flattering me and making me conceited," cried Eleanor, when
the laugh ended.

"Huh! Mek a Blairsdale 'ceited?" retorted Mammy, as she started up to
the attic. "Dey's got too much what dey _knows_ is de right stuff fer
ter pester dey haids studyin' 'bout it; it's right dar all de endurin'
time; dey ain' gotter chase atter it lessen dey loses it."

"Was there ever such a philosopher as Mammy?" laughed Constance as
they got beyond hearing.

"Wish there were a few more with as much sound sense--black or white--"
answered Eleanor as she shook out one of Jean's frocks and hung it
across the clothes-line.

A moment later Mammy joined them with more garments which cried aloud
for the glorious fresh air and sunshine. She hung piece after piece
upon the line, giving a shake here, a pat there, or almost a caress
upon another, for each one recalled to her loving old heart the memory
of more prosperous days, and each held its story for her. When all
were swinging in the sunshine she stepped back and surveyed the array,
her mouth pursed up quizzically, but her eyes full of kindness.

"What are you thinking of Mammy?" asked Constance, slipping her
fingers into Mammy's work-hardened hand very much as she had done when
a little child.

"Hum; Um: What's I t'inkin' of? I'se t'inkin' dat ar lot ob clo'se
supin lak we-all here: De'y good stuff in um, an' I reckon dey c'n
stan' 'spection, on'y dey sartin _do_ stan' in need ob jist a _leetle_
spondulix fer ter put em in shape. Dar's _too much_ ob em spread all
_ober_. What dey needs is ter rip off some o' dem _ruffles_ and jis
hang ter de plain frocks ter tek keer ob. We spen's a heap ob time
breshin' ruffles dat we better spen' tekin' keer ob de frocks in,"
concluded Mammy with a sage nod as she turned and walked into the
house.

"Upon my word I believe Mammy's pretty near right Eleanor. We _have_
got a good many _ruffles_ to take care of on this big place and I
sometimes feel that mother is wearing herself out caring for them.
Perhaps we would be wiser to give them up."

"Perhaps we would," agreed Eleanor, "but where will we go if we give
up the home? We have hardly known any other, for we were both too
little to think much about homes or anything else when we came into
this one. For my part, I am ready to do whatever is best and wisest,
although I love every stick and stone here. Mother has looked terribly
worried lately although she hasn't said one word to me. Has she to
you?

"No, nothing at all. But I know what you mean; her eyes look so tired.
I wonder if anything new has arisen to make her anxious. She says so
little at any time. I mean to have a talk with her this evening if I
can get a chance. Do you get Jean out of the way. She is such an
everlasting chatterbox that there is no hope of a quiet half hour
while she is around. Now let's take an inventory of this array and
plan my frivolity frock," and Constance drew Eleanor down upon a
rustic seat at one side of the lawn to discuss the absorbing question
of the new gown to be evolved from some of the old ones which were
swaying in the wind.

Perhaps a half hour passed, the girls were giving little heed to time,
for the drowsy dreamy influence of the afternoon was impressing itself
upon them. Constance had planned the gown to the minutest detail,
Eleanor agreeing and secretly marveling at her ability to do so, when
both became aware of a strong odor of smoke.

"What is burning, I wonder?" said Constance, glancing in the direction
of a patch of woodland not far off.

"Leaves, most likely. The Henrys' gardener has burned piles and piles
of them ever since they began falling. I shouldn't think there would
be any left for him to burn," answered Eleanor, looking in the same
direction.

"It doesn't smell like leaves, it smells like wood, and--oh! Eleanor,
Eleanor, look! look at your window! The smoke is just pouring from it!
The house is a-fire! Run! Run! Quick! Quick!"




CHAPTER IX

Spontaneous Combustion


Had the ground opened and disgorged the town, men, women and children
could hardly have appeared upon the scene with more startling
promptitude than they appeared within five minutes after Constance's
discovery of the smoke. How they got there only those who manage to
get to every fire before the alarm ceases to sound can explain, and,
as usual, there arrived with them the over-officious, and the
over-zealous.

As Constance and Eleanor rushed into the house, the multitude rushed
across the grounds and followed them hotfoot, while one, more
level-headed than his fellows, hastened to the nearest fire-box to
turn in an alarm.

Meanwhile Mammy had also smelt the smoke, and as the girls ran through
the front hall she came through the back one crying:

"Fo' de Lawd's sake wha' done happen? De house gwine burn down on top
our haids?"

"Quick, Mammy. It's Eleanor's room," cried Constance as she flew up
the stairs.

Mammy needed no urging. In one second she had grasped the situation
and was up in Mrs. Carruth's room dragging forth such articles and
treasures as she knew to be most valued and piling them into a
blanket. There was little time to waste for the flames had made
considerable headway when discovered and were roaring wildly through
the upper floor when the fire apparatus arrived. Mrs. Carruth was out
driving with a friend and Jean was off with her beloved Amy Fletcher.

Only those who have witnessed such a scene can form any adequate idea
of the confusion which followed that outburst of smoke from Eleanor's
windows. Men ran hither and thither carrying from the burning house
whatever articles they could lay their hands upon, to drop them from
the windows to those waiting below to catch them. Firemen darted in
and out, apparently impervious to either flames or smoke, directing
their hose where the streams would prove most effectual and sending
gallons of water upon the darting flames. The fact that the fire had
started in the third-story saved many articles from destruction by the
flames, although the deluge of water which flooded the house and
poured down the stairways like miniature Niagaras speedily ruined what
the flames spared.

Eleanor rushed toward her room but was quickly driven back by a burst
of flames and smoke that nearly suffocated her, while Constance flew
to Jean's and her own room, meanwhile calling directions to Mammy.
Five minutes, however, from the time they entered the house they were
forced to beat a retreat, encountering as they ran Miss Jerusha Pike,
a neighbor who never missed any form of excitement or interesting
occurrence in her neighborhood.

"What can I do? Have you saved your ma's clothes? Did you get out that
mirror that belonged to your great-grandmother?" she cried, as she
laid a detaining hand upon Constance's arm.

"I don't know, Miss Pike. Come out quick. It isn't safe to stay here
another second. We must let the men save what they can. Come."

"No! No! I _must_ save your grandmother's mirror. I know just where it
hangs. You get out quick. I won't be a second. Go!"

"Never mind the mirror, there are other things more valuable than
that," cried Eleanor as she tugged at the determined old lady's arm.
But Miss Pike was not to be deterred and rushed away to the second
story in spite of them.

"She'll be burned to death! I _know_ she will," wailed Constance, as a
man ran across the hall calling:

"Miss Carruth, Miss Constance, where are you? You must get out of here
instantly!"

"Oh, Mr. Stuyvesant, Miss Pike has gone up to mother's room and I must
go after her."

"You must do nothing of the sort. Come out at once both of you. I'll
see to her when I've got you to a place of safety," and without more
ado Hadyn Stuyvesant hurried them both from the house to the lawn,
where a motley crowd was gathered, and their household goods and
chattels were lying about in the utmost confusion, while other
articles, escorted by various neighbors, were being borne along the
street to places of safety. One extremely proper and precise maiden
lady was struggling along under an armful of Mr. Carruth's
dress-shirts and pajamas brought forth from nobody knew where. A
portly matron, with the tread of a general, followed her with a
flatiron in one hand and a tiny doll in the other, while behind her a
small boy of eight staggered beneath the weight of a wash boiler.

"Where is Mammy? O _where_ is Mammy?" cried Eleanor, clasping her
hands and looking toward the burning building.

"Here me! Here me!" answered Mammy's voice as she hurried toward them
with a great bundle of rescued articles. "I done drug dese yer t'ings
f'om de burer in yo' ma's room an' do you keep tight fas' 'em 'twell I
come back. Mind now what I'se telling' yo' kase dere's t'ings in dar
dat she breck her heart ter lose. I'se gwine back fer sumpin' else."

"O Mammy! Mammy, _don't go_. You'll be burned to death," cried
Constance, laying her hand upon Mammy's arm to restrain her.

"You mustn't Mammy! You mustn't," echoed Eleanor.

"Stay here with the girls, Mammy, and let me get whatever it is you
are bent upon saving," broke in Hadyn Stuyvesant.

"Aint no time for argufying," cried Mammy, her temper rising at the
opposition. "You chillun stan' _dar_ an' tek kere ob _dat_ bundle, lak
I tell yo' an' yo', Massa Stuyv'sant, come 'long back wid me," was the
ultimatum, and, laughing in spite of the gravity of the situation,
Hadyn Stuyvesant followed Mammy whom he ever afterward called the
General.

As they hurried back to the kitchen entrance the one farthest removed
from the burning portion of the building, Mammy's eyes were seemingly
awake to every thing, and her tongue loosed of all bounds. As they
neared the dining-room someone was dropping pieces of silver out of
the window to someone else who stood just below it with skirts
outspread to catch the articles.

"Ain' dat de very las' bit an' grain o' nonsense?" panted Mammy.
"Dey's a-heavin' de silver plate outen de winder, an' bangin' it all
ter smash stidder totin' it froo' de back do', and fo' Gawd's sake
look dar, Massa Stuyv'sant! Dar go de' lasses!" cried Mammy, her hands
raised above her head as her words ended in a howl of derision, for,
overcome with excitement the person who was dropping the pieces of
silver had deliberately turned the syrup-jug bottom-side up and
deluged the person below with the contents. Had he felt sure that it
would have been his last Hadyn Stuyvesant could not have helped
breaking into peals of laughter, nor was the situation rendered less
absurd by the sudden reappearance of Miss Pike clasping the treasured
mirror to her breast and crying:

"Thank heaven! Thank heaven I'm alive and have _saved_ it. _Where_,
where are those dear girls that I may deliver this priceless treasure
into their hands?"

"Out yonder near the hedge, Miss Pike. I'm thankful you escaped. They
are much concerned about you. Better get along to them quick; I'm
under Mammy's orders," answered Hadyn when he could speak.

Off hurried the zealous female while Hadyn Stuyvesant followed Mammy
who was fairly snorting with indignation.

"Dat 'oman certain'y _do_ mak' me mad. Dat lookin' glass! Huh! I
reckons when Miss Jinny git back an' find what happen she aint goin'
ter study 'bout no lookin' glasses. No suh! She be studyin' 'bout whar
we all gwine put our _haids_ dis yere night. An' dat's what _I_ done
plan fer," concluded Mammy laying vigorous hold of a great roll of
bedding which she had carried to a place of safety just outside the
kitchen porch. "Please, suh, tek' holt here an' holp me get it out
yander ter de stable, I'se done got a sight o' stuff out dere
a-reddy," and sure enough Mammy, unaided, had carried enough
furniture, bedding and such articles as were absolutely indispensable
for living, out to the stable to enable the family to "camp out" for
several days, and with these were piled the garments hastily snatched
from the clothes-lines, Baltie mounting guard over all. Mrs. Carruth
had not been so very far wrong when she told Mammy she believed she
could move the house if necessity arose.

Meanwhile Miss Pike and her rescued mirror had reached the hedge, the
girls breathing a sigh of relief when they saw her bearing
triumphantly down upon them.

"There! There! If I never do another deed as long as I live I shall
feel that I have _not_ lived in vain! What _would_ your poor mother
have said had she returned to find this priceless heirloom destroyed,"
she cried, as she rested the mirror against a tree trunk and clasped
her hands in rapture at sight of it.

"Perhaps mother _might_ ask first whether _we_ had been rescued,"
whispered Constance, but added quickly, "_there_ is mother now. O I
wonder who told her," for just then a carriage was driven rapidly to
the front gate and as the girls ran toward it Mrs. Carruth stepped
quickly from it. She was very white and asked almost breathlessly,
"Girls, girls, is anyone hurt? Are you _all_ safe? Where's Mammy?"

"We are all safe mother, Mammy is here. Don't be frightened. We have
done everything possible and the fire is practically out now," said
Constance, passing her arm about her mother who was trembling
violently.

"Don't be alarmed, mother. It isn't really so dreadful as it might
have been; it truly isn't," said Eleanor soothingly. "Loads of things
have been saved."

"Yes, Mammy has outgeneraled us all, Mrs. Carruth," cried Hadyn
Stuyvesant, who now came hurrying upon the scene. "I guess she has
shown more sense than all the rest of us put together, for she's kept
her head."

"And oh, my dear! My dear, if all else were lost there is one
invaluable treasure spared to you! Come with me. I saved it for you
with my own hands. Come!" cried Miss Pike, as she slipped her arm
through Mrs. Carruth's and hurried her willy-nilly across the lawn.

There was the little round mirror in its quaint old-fashioned frame
leaning against the tree and reflecting all the weird scene in its
shining surface, and there, too, directly in front of it, strutted a
lordly game cock which belonged to the Carruths' next door neighbor.
How he happened to be there, in the midst of so much excitement and
confusion no one paused to consider, but as Miss Pike hurried poor
Mrs. Carruth toward the spot, Sir Chanticleer's burnished ruff began
to rise and the next instant there was a defiant squawk, a frantic
dash of brilliantly iridescent feathers, and the cherished heirloom
lay shattered beneath the triumphant game-cock's feet as he voiced a
long and very jubilant crow.

It was the stroke needed, for in spite of the calamity which had
overtaken her this was too much for Mrs. Carruth's sense of humor and
she collapsed upon the piano stool which stood conveniently at hand,
while Miss Pike bewailed Chanticleer's deed until one might have
believed it had been her own revered ancestor's mirror which had been
shattered by him.

Just then Mammy came hurrying upon the scene and was quick enough to
grasp the situation at a glance.

"Bress de Lawd, Honey, ain' I allers tol' ye' chickens got secon'
sight? Dat roos'er see double suah. He see himself in dat lookin'
glass an' bus' it wide open, an' he see we-all need ter laf stidder
cry, an' so he set out ter mek us."

At sight of her Mrs. Carruth stretched forth both hands like an
unhappy child and was gathered into her faithful old arms as she
cried:

"But oh, Mammy; Mammy, the insurance; the insurance. If I had _only_
been able to pay it yesterday."

"Huh! Don't you fret ober de 'surance. Jis clap yo' eyes on _dat_,"
and Mammy thrust into her Miss Jinny's hands a paper which she hastily
drew from the bosom of her frock.




CHAPTER X

Readjustment


It was all over. The excitement had subsided and all that remained to
tell the story of the previous afternoon's commotion was a
fire-scorched, water-soaked dwelling with a miscellaneous collection
of articles decorating its lawn. When the early morning sunshine
looked down upon the home which for eight years had sheltered the
Carruths, it beheld desolation complete. Alas for Eleanor's chemicals!
Her experiments had cost the family dear.

The only living being in sight was a policeman mounting guard over the
ruins. A staid and stolid son of the Vatterland who had spent the wee
sma' hours upon the premises and now stood upon the piazza upright and
rigid as the inanimate objects all about him. Beside him was a small,
toy horse "saddled and bridled and ready to ride," and anything more
absurd than the picture cut by this guardian of the law and his
miniature charger it would be hard to imagine.

Meanwhile the family was housed among friends who had been quick to
offer them shelter, Mr. Stuyvesant insisting that Mrs. Carruth and
Constance accept his aunt's hospitality through him, while the next
door neighbor, Mr. Henry, harbored Eleanor, Jean and Mammy, who
refused point blank to go beyond sight of the premises and her
charge--Baltie.

Mammy was the heroine of the hour; for what the old woman had not
thought of when everyone else's wits were scattered was hardly worth
thinking of. In the blanket which she had charged the girls to guard
were all of Mrs. Carruth's greatest treasures, among them a beautiful
miniature of Mr. Carruth of which no one but Mammy had thought.
Jewelry which had belonged to her mother was there, valuable papers
hastily snatched from her desk, and many of the girl's belongings
which would never have been saved but for Mammy's forethought. At
seven o'clock, when all was over, the crowd dispersed and the family
gathered together in Mr. Henry's living-room to collect their wits and
draw a long breath, Mrs. Carruth drew Mammy to one side to ask:

"Mammy, what is the meaning of this receipt? I cannot understand it.
Who has paid this sum and where was it paid?"

"Baby, dere comes times when 'taint a mite er use ter tell what we
gwine _do_. Dat 'surance hatter be squar'd up an' dat settled it. So
_I_ squar'd it--."

"Oh, Mammy! Mammy!" broke in Mrs. Carruth, almost in tears.

"Hush, chile! Pay 'tention ter _me_. What would a come of we-all if I
hadn't paid dat bill den an' dar? Bress de Lawd I had de cash an' don'
pester me wid questions. Ain' I tole yo' I'se _rich_? Well den, dat
settles it. When _yo_ is, yo' kin settle wid _me_. _Dat_ don' need no
argufyin' do it? Now go long wid Miss Constance an' Massa Stuyvesant
lak dey say an' git yo' sef ca'med down. Yo' all a shakin' an' a
shiverin' lak yo' got de ager, an' dat won' never do in de roun'
worl'. Yo'll be down sick on my han's."

And that was all the old woman would ever hear about it. When the
thirty dollars were returned to her in the course of a few days she
took it with a chuckle saying:

"Huh! Reckons _I_ knows wha' ter investigate _my_ money. Done git my
intrus so quick it like ter scar me."

After the first excitement was over came the question of where the
family was to live, and it was Hadyn Stuyvesant who settled it
forthwith by offering the home which had been his mother's; a pretty
little dwelling in the heart of Riveredge which had been closed since
his mother's death and his own residence with his aunt. So in the
course of the next week the Carruths were installed therein and began
to adjust themselves to the new conditions The first question to be
answered was the one concerning their home. Should it be rebuilt with
the money to be paid by the insurance company, or should it be sold?
It was hard to decide, for sentiment was strongly in favor of
returning to the home they all loved, while sound sense dictated
selling the land and thus lessening expenses. Sound sense carried the
day, and the little house on Hillside street became home, and in the
course of a few weeks the machinery ran along with its accustomed
smoothness, although it was some time before the family recovered from
the shock of realizing how close they had come to losing all they
possessed, and also keenly alive to the fact that what _had_ been
saved must be carefully guarded. Fifteen thousand was not an alarming
sum to fall back upon and the rent for the new home although modest,
compared with what their own would have commanded, had to be
considered.

Meanwhile the girls had returned to their school duties, the older
ones working harder than ever, especially Eleanor, whose conscience
troubled her not a little at thought of her carelessness which had
caused all the trouble, for well she realized that her failure to care
properly for the powerful acids with which she had been experimenting
when Constance appeared upon the scene had started the fire.

Constance had immediately set to work to evolve from the apparel
rescued a winter wardrobe for the family, and displayed such ingenuity
in bringing about new gowns and headgear from the old ones that the
family flourished like green bay trees. Still Constance was not
satisfied, and one afternoon said to Eleanor, who now shared her room,
but who had _not_ laid in a new supply of chemicals:

"Nornie, put down that book and listen to me, for I'm simmering with
words o' wisdom and if I don't find a vent I'll boil over presently."

Eleanor laid aside the book she was poring over, laughing as she
asked:

"What is it--some new scheme for making a two-pound steak feed five
hungry mouths, or a preparation to apply to the soles of shoes to keep
them from wearing out?"

"It has more to do with the stomach than the feet, but I'm not joking.
I want to take account of stock and find out just where we are _at_
and just what we _can_ do. Mother has her hands and head more than
full just now, and I think _I_ ought to give a pull at the wheel too."

"And what shall _I_ be about while you are doing the pulling? It seems
to me a span can usually pull harder than a single horse. By-the-way,
apropos of horses, what _has_ Mammy done to poor old Baltie? Do you
realize that she has not yet had him two months, but no one would ever
recognize the old horse for the decrepit creature Jean led home that
afternoon."

"I know it! Isn't she a marvel? I believe she is half witch. Why,
blind and twenty-five years old as he is, old Baltie to-day would
bring Jabe Raulsbury enough money to make the covetous old sinner
smile, I believe; if anything on earth could make him smile. I thought
I should have screamed when she started off with her steed the other
day. That old phaeton and harness she found in the barn here were
especially sent by Providence, I believe. I never expect to see a
funnier sight if I live to be a hundred years old than Mammy driving
off down the road with that great basket of apples by her side and
Jean perched behind in the rumble. Mammy was simply superb and proud
as the African princess she insists she is," and Constance laughed
heartily at the picture she made.

"What did she do with her apples? I wish I could have seen her," cried
Eleanor.

"She had them stored away in our cellar. She had gathered them herself
from mother's pet tree and packed them carefully in a couple of
barrels. How on earth she finds time to do all the things she manages
to I can't understand. She took that basket out to Mrs. Fletcher. You
remember Mrs. Fletcher once said there were no apples like ours and
Mammy remembered it. Still, I am afraid Mrs. Fletcher would never have
seen that basket of apples if her home had not adjoined the Raulsbury
place. You know Jabe had to pay a large fine before he could get free.
Such an hour of triumph rarely comes to two human beings as came to
Mammy and Jean when they drove that old horse past Jabe's gateway and
kind fate drew him to that very spot at the moment. Mammy is still
chuckling over it, and Jean isn't to be lived with. But enough of
Mammy and her charger, let's get to stock-taking."

"Yes, do," said Eleanor.

"I've been putting things down in black and white and here it is,"
said practical Constance, opening a little memorandum book and seating
herself beside her sister. "You see mother has barely fifteen hundred
dollars a year from father's life insurance and even _that_ is
somewhat lessened by the slump in those old stocks. Now comes the fire
insurance settlement and the interest on that won't be over seven
hundred at the outside, will it?"

"I'm afraid not," said Eleanor with a doubtful shake of her head. "But
suppose we are able to sell the old place?"

"Yes, 'suppose.' If we _do_, well and good, but supposes aren't much
account for immediate needs, and those are the things we've got to
think about now."

"Then let me think too," broke in Eleanor.

"You may _think_ all you've a mind to; that's exactly what your brains
are for, and some day you'll astonish us all. Meanwhile _I'll_ work."

"Now, Constance, what are you planning? You know perfectly well that
if you leave school and take up something that _I_ shall too. I
_won't_ take all the advantages."

"Who said I had any notion of leaving school? Not a bit of it. My plan
won't affect my school work. But of that later. Now to our capital.
Mother will have at the outside nineteen hundred a year, and out of
that she will have to pay five hundred rent for this house. That
leaves fourteen hundred wherewith to feed and clothe five people,
doesn't it? Now, she can't possibly _feed_, let alone clothe, us for
less than twenty dollars a week, can she? And out of that must come
fuel which is no small matter now-a-days. That leaves only three
hundred and sixty dollars for all the other expenses of the year, and,
Nornie, it isn't enough. We _could_ live on less in town I dare say,
but town is no place for Jean while she's so little. She'd give up the
ghost without a place to romp in. Then, too, mother loves every stone
in Riveredge, and she is going to _stay_ here if I can manage it. So
listen: You know what a fuss everybody at the fair made over my
nut-fudge and pralines. Well, I'm going to make candy to sell----."

"Oh, Constance, you can't! You mustn't!" interrupted Eleanor whose
instincts shrank from any member of her family launching upon a
business enterprise.

"I can and I _must_," contradicted Constance positively. "And what is
more, I shall. So don't have a conniption fit right off, because I've
thought it all out and I know just exactly what I can do."

"Mother will _never consent_," said Eleanor firmly, and added, "and I
hope she won't."

"Now Nornie, see here," cried Constance with decided emphasis. "What
_is_ the use of being so ridiculously high and mighty? We aren't the
first people, by a long chalk, that have met with financial reverses
and been forced to do something to earn a livelihood. The woods are
full of them and they are none the less respected either. For my part,
I'd rather hustle round and earn my own duddies than settle down and
wish for them, and wail because I can't have them while mother strives
and struggles to make both ends meet. I haven't _brains_ to do big
things in the world, but I've got what Mammy calls 'de bangenest
han's' and we'll see what they'll bang out!" concluded Constance
resolutely.

"Mammy will never let you," cried Eleanor, playing what she felt to be
her trump card.

"On the contrary, Mammy is going to _help_ me," announced Constance
triumphantly.

"_What_, Mammy consent to a Blairsdale going into trade?" cried
Eleanor, feeling very much as though the foundations of the house were
sinking.

"Even so, Lady," answered Constance, laughing at her sister's look of
dismay. "Old Baltie was not rescued for naught. His days of usefulness
were not ended as you shall see. But don't look so horrified, and,
above all else, don't say one word to mother. There is no use to worry
her, and remember she _is_ a Blairsdale and it won't be so easy to
bring her to my way of thinking as it has been to bring _you_; you're
only half one, like myself, and remember we've got Carruth blood to
give us mercantile instincts."

"As though the Carruths were not every bit as good as the
Blairsdales," brindled Eleanor indignantly.

"Cock-a-doodle! See its feathers ruffle. You are as spunky as the
Henry's game cock," cried Constance laughing and gathering Eleanor's
head into her arms to maul it until her hair came down.

"Well," retorted Eleanor, struggling to free herself from the
tempestuous embrace, "so they are."

"Yes, my beloved sister. I'll admit all that, but bear in mind that
_their_ ancestors were born in Pennsylvania _not_ in 'ole Caroliny,
and that's the difference 'twixt tweedle-dum and tweedle-dee. I don't
believe Mad Anthony stopped to consider whether he was a patrician or
a plebeian when he was storming old Stony Point, or getting fodder for
Valley Forge, so I don't believe _I_ will, when I set out to hustle
for frocks and footgear for his descendants. So put your pride in your
pocket, Nornie, and watch me grow rich and the family blossom out in
luxuries undreamed of. I'm going to _do_ it: you'll see," ended
Constance in a tone so full of hope and courage that Eleanor then and
there resolved not to argue the point further or discourage her.

"When are you going to begin this enterprise?" she asked.

"This very day. I'm only waiting for Mammy to come back from market
with some things I need, and there she is now. Good-bye. Go look after
the little Mumsie, or Jean; you'd find your hands full with the last
undertaking, no doubt," and with a merry laugh Constance ran
down-stairs to greet Mammy who was just entering the back door.




CHAPTER XI

First Ventures


"Did you get all the things, Mammy?" cried Constance, as she flew into
the kitchen where Mammy stood puffing and panting like a grampus, for
the new home was at the top of a rather steep ascent and the climb
took the old woman's breath.

"Co'se Ise got 'em," panted Mammy, as she untied the strings of her
bright purple worsted hood. "Dar dey is, all ob 'em, eve'y one, an yo'
kin git busy jes' as fas' as yo's a mind ter. But, la, honey, don' yo'
let yo' _ma_ know nothin' 'tall 'bout it, 'cause she lak 'nough frail
me out fer lettin' yo' do hit. But sumpin 's gotter be done in dis
yere fambly. What wid de rint fer _dis_ place, an' de taxes for de
yether, an' de prices dey's teken' ter chargin', fer t'ings ter _eat_,
I 'clar' ter goodness dar ain't gwine be nuffin 'tall lef' fer we-all
ter fall back on ef we done teken sick, er bleeged ter do sumpin'
extra," ended Mammy as she bustled about putting away her things and
untying the packages as Constance lifted them from the basket.

"Yes, you've got every single thing I need, Mammy, and now I'll begin
right off. Which kettles and pans can you spare for my very own? I
don't want to bother to ask every time and if I have my own set at the
very beginning that saves bother in the end," cried Constance, as she
slipped her arms through the shoulder straps of a big gingham apron
and after many contortions succeeded in buttoning it back of her
shoulders.

"Dar you is!" said Mammy, taking from their hooks, above her range two
immaculate porcelain saucepans, and standing them upon the
well-scrubbed kitchen table with enough emphasis to give the transfer
significance. "Dey's yours fer keeps, but don' yo' let me ketch yo'
burnin' de bottoms of 'em."

Mammy could not resist this authoritative warning. Then bustling
across to her pantry she took out three shining pans and placed them
beside the saucepans, asking:

"Now is yo' fixed wid all de impert'nances ob de bisness?"

"All but the fire, Mammy," laughed Constance, rolling up her sleeves
to disclose two strong, well-rounded arms.

"Well yo' fire's gwine ter be gas _dis_ time, chile'. Yo' kin do what
yo's a-mind ter wid dat little gas refrig'rator, what yo' turns on an'
off wid de spiggots; _I_ aint got er mite er use fer hit. It lak ter
scare me mos' ter deaf de fust mawnin' I done try ter cook de breckfus
on it,--sputterin' an' roarin' lak it gwine blow de hull house up.
No-siree, I ain' gwine be pestered wid no sich doin's 's _dat_. Stoves
an' wood 's good 'nough fer _dis_ 'oman," asserted Mammy with an
empathic wag of her head, for she had never before seen a gas range,
and was not in favor of innovations.

"Then I'm in luck," cried Constance, as she struck a match to light up
her "gas refrigerator," Mammy meanwhile eying her with not a little
misgiving, and standing as far as possible from the fearsome thing.
"Tek keer, honey! Yo' don' know what dem new-fangled mak'-believe
stoves lak ter do. Fust t'ing yo' know it bus' wide open mebbe."

"Don't be scared, Mammy. They are all right, and safe as can be if you
know how to handle them, and lots less trouble than the stove."

"Dat may be too," was Mammy's skeptical reply. "But _I'll_ tek de
trouble stidder de chance of a busted haid."

Before long the odor of boiling sugar filled the little kitchen, the
confectioner growing warm and rosy as she wielded a huge wooden spoon
in the boiling contents of her saucepans, and whistled like a song
thrush. Constance Carruth's whistle had always been a marvel to the
members of her family, and the subject of much comment to the few
outsiders who had been fortunate enough to hear it, occasionally, for
it was well worth hearing. It had a wonderful flute-like quality, with
the softest, tenderest, low notes. Moreover, she whistled without any
apparent effort, or the ordinary distortion of the mouth which
whistling generally involves. The position of her lips seemed scarcely
altered while the soft sounds fell from them. But she was very shy
about her "one accomplishment," as she laughingly called it, and could
rarely be induced to whistle for others, though she seldom worked
without filling the house with that birdlike melody. As she grew more
and more absorbed with her candy-making the clear, sweet notes rose
higher and higher, their rapid _crescendo_ and increasing _tempo_
indicating her successful progress toward a desired end.

While apparently engaged in preparing a panful of apples, Mammy was
covertly watching her, for, next to her baby, Jean, Constance was
Mammy's pet.

When the candy was done, Constance poured it into the pans.

"Now in just about two jiffies that will be ready to cut. Keep one eye
on it, won't you Mammy, while I run up-stairs for my paraffin paper,"
she said, as she set the pans outside to cool and whisked from the
kitchen, Mammy saying under her breath as she vanished:

"If folks could once hear dat chile _whis'le_ dey'd hanker fef ter
hear it agin, an' dey'd keep on a hankerin' twell dey'd _done_ hit.
She beat der bu'ds, an' dat's a fac'."

"Now I guess I can cut it," cried Constance, as she came hurrying
back.

The sudden chill of the keen November air had made the candy the exact
consistency for cutting into little squares, and in the course of the
next half hour they were all cut, carefully wrapped in bits of
paraffin paper and neatly tied in small white paper packages with
baby-ribbon of different colors. Four dozen as inviting parcels of
delicious home-made candy as any one could desire, and all made and
done up within an hour and a half.

"There, Mammy! What do you think of _that_ for my initial venture?"
asked Constance, looking with not a little satisfaction upon the
packages as they lay in the large flat box into which she had
carefully packed them.

"Bate yo' dey hits de markit spang on de haid," chuckled Mammy. "An'
now _I'se_ gwine tek holt. La, ain' I gwine cut a dash, dough! Yo' see
_me_," and hastily donning her hood and shawl, and catching up an
apple from her panful, off Mammy hurried to the little stable which
stood in one corner of the small grounds, where Baltie had lived, and
certainly flourished since the family came to dwell in this new home.

Mammy never entered that stable without some tidbit for her pet, for
she had grown to love the blind old horse as well as Jean did, and was
secretly consumed with pride at his transformation. As she entered the
stable, Baltie greeted her with his soft nicker.

"Yas, honey, Mammy's comin'; comin' wid yo' lolly-pop, kase she want
yo' ter step out spry. Yo's gwine enter a pa'tner-ship, yo' know
_dat_, Baltie-hawse? Yo' sure _is_. Yo's de silen' pa'tner, yo' is,
an' de bline one too. Jis as well ter hab one ob 'em bline mebbe," and
Mammy chuckled delightedly at her own joke. "Now come 'long out an' be
hitched up, kase we's gwine inter business, yo' an' me' an' we gotter
do some hustlin'. Come 'long," and opening the door of the box-stall
in which old Baltie now-a-days luxuriated, Mammy dragged him forth by
his forelock and in less time than one could have believed it
possible, had him harnessed to the old-fashioned basket phaeton which
during Mrs. Stuyvesant's early married life had been a most up-to-date
equipage, but which now looked as odd and antiquated as the old horse
harnessed to it. But in Mammy's eyes they were tangible riches, for
Hadyn Stuyvesant had presented her with both phaeton and harness.

Opening wide the stable doors, Mammy clambered into her chariot, and
taking up the reins, guided her steed gently forward. Baltie ambled
sedately up to the back door where Constance was waiting to hand Mammy
the box.

"Mind de do' an' don' let my apples bake all ter cinders," warned
Mammy.

"I will. I won't. Good luck," contradicted Constance, as she ran back
into the house, and Mammy drove off toward South Riveredge; a section
of the town as completely given over to commercial interests as
Riveredge proper was to its homes. There a large carpet factory throve
and flourished giving employment to many hands. There, also, stood a
large building called the Central Arcade in which many business men
had their offices. It was about a mile from the heart of Riveredge
proper and as Mammy jogged along toward her destination, she had ample
time to think, and chuckle to herself at her astuteness in carrying
out her own ideas of the fitness of things while apparently fully
concurring with Constance's wishes. Mammy had no objections to
Constance _making_ all the candy she chose to make; that could be done
within the privacy of her own home and shock _no_ one's sensibilities.
But when the girl had announced her intention of going among her
friends to secure customers, Mammy had descended upon her with all her
powers of opposition. The outcome had been the present compromise.
Very few people in South Riveredge knew the Carruths or Mammy, and
this was exactly what the old woman wished.

Driving her "gallumping" steed to the very heart of the busy town she
drew up at the curbstone in front of the Arcade just a few moments
before the five o'clock whistles blew. Stepping from her vehicle she
placed a campstool upon the sidewalk beside it, and lifting her box of
candy from the seat established herself upon her stool with the open
box upon her lap. Within two minutes of the blowing of the whistles
the streets were alive with people who came hurrying from the
buildings on every side. Mammy was a novelty and like most novelties
took at once, so presently she was doing a thriving business, her
tongue going as fast as her packages of candy. People are not unlike
sheep; where one leads, all the others follow.

"Home-made candy, sah! Fresh f'om de home-kitchen; jis done mek hit.
Ain' hardly col'. Ten cents a package, sah. Yes _sah_, yo' better is
bleeve hit's deleshus. Yo' ain' tas' no pralines lak dem in all yo'
bo'n days," ran on Mammy handing out her packages of candy and
dropping her dimes into the little bag at her side.

"Here, Aunty, give me four of those packages of fudge," cried a
genial, gray-haired, portly old gentleman with a military bearing.
"Porter, here, has just given me some of his and they're simply great!
Did you make 'em? They touch the spot."

"La, suh, I ain' _got_ four left: I ain', fer a fac'. Tek some of de
pralines; deys mighty good, suh," bustled Mammy, offering her
dainties.

"Take all you've got. Did _you_ make 'em?" persisted her customer.

"My _pa'tner_ done mak 'em," said Mammy with dignity, as she handed
over her last package.

"Well you darkies _can_ cook," cried the gentleman as he took the
candy.

For a moment it seemed as though Mammy were about to fly at him, and
her customer was not a little astounded at the transformation which
came over her old face. Then he concluded that the term "darkie" had
been the rock on which they had split, and smiled as he said:

"Better set up business right here in the Arcade. Buy you and your
_partner_ out every day. Good-bye, Auntie."

"Good-bye, suh! Good-bye," responded Mammy, her equanimity quite
restored, for her good sense told her that no reflections had been
cast upon her "pa'tner" in Riveredge, or her identity suspected.
Moreover, her late customer had put a new idea into her wise old head
which she turned over again and again as she drove back home.

Constance was waiting with the lantern, and hurried out to the stable
as Mammy turned in at the gate.

"Oh, Mammy, did you _sell_ some?" she asked eagerly.

"Sell some! What I done druv dar fer? Co'se I sell some; I sell eve'y
las' bit an' grain. Tek dat bag an' go count yo' riches, honey. _Sell
some!_ Yah! Yah!" laughed Mammy as she descended from her chariot and
began to unharness her steed, while Constance hugged the bag and
hurried into the house.

"What are you hiding under your cape?" demanded Jean as her sister ran
through the hall, and up the stairs. Jean's eyes did not often miss
anything.

"My deed to future wealth and greatness," answered Constance merrily,
as she slipped into her room and locked the door, where she dumped the
contents of the bag, dimes, nickels, and pennies, into the middle of
the bed.

"Merciful sakes! Who would have believed it?" she gasped. "Four
dollars and eighty cents for one afternoon's work, and at least
three-eighty of it clear profit, and Mammy has _got_ to share some of
it. Mumsie, dear, I think I can keep the family's feet covered at all
events," she concluded in an ecstatic whisper.




CHAPTER XII

Another Shoulder is Added


Thanksgiving and Christmas had come and passed. Constance's "candy
business" as she called it, throve and flourished spasmodically. Could
she have carried out her wishes concerning it, the venture might have
been more profitable, but Mammy, the autocrat, insisted that it should
be kept a secret, and the habit of obedience to the old woman's
dictates was deeply rooted in the Carruth family, even Mrs. Carruth
yielding to it far more than she realized.

So Constance made her candy during her free hours after school and
Mammy carried it into South Riveredge when opportunity offered. This
was sometimes twice, but more often only once, a week, for the
faithful old soul had manifold duties and was too conscientious to
neglect one. Sometimes all the packages were sold off as quickly as
they had been on that first red-letter day, but at other times a good
many were left over. Could they again have been offered for sale upon
the following day they might easily have been disposed of, but Mammy
could not go to South Riveredge two days in succession and,
consequently, the candy grew stale before another sale's day arrived,
was a loss to its anxious manufacturer, and caused her profits to
shrink very seriously. Things had been going on in this rather
unsatisfactory manner for about six weeks when one Saturday morning
little Miss Paulina Pry, as Constance sometimes called Jean, owing to
her propensity to get to the bottom of things in spite of all efforts
to circumvent her, came into her sister's room to ask in the most
innocent manner imaginable:

"Connie, who does Mammy know in South Riveredge?"

"Nobody, that I know of," answered Constance unsuspectingly.

"I thought she had a cousin living there," was the next leader.

"A cousin, child! Why Mammy hasn't a relative this side of Raleigh and
I don't believe she has two to her name down there. If she has, she
hasn't seen them since mother brought her north before we were born."

"I knew it!" was the triumphant retort, "and _now_ I'll get even with
her for telling me fibs."

"Jean, what do you mean?" cried Constance now fully alive to the fact
that she had fallen into a trap.

"I mean just this: I've been watching Mammy drive off to South
Riveredge every solitary week since before Thanksgiving, and I've
asked her ever so many times to take me with her; she lets me go
everywhere else with her and Baltie. But she wouldn't take me there
and when I asked her why not, she always said because she was going to
visit with her cousins in-the-Lord, and 'twan't no fit place for white
folks. I _knew_ she was telling a fib, and _now_ I'm going right down
stairs to tell her so," and Jean whirled about to run from the room.
Constance made a wild dive and caught her by her sleeve.

"Jean, stop! Listen to me. You are not to bother Mammy with questions.
She has a perfect right to do or go as she chooses," said Constance
with some warmth, and instantly realized that she had taken the wrong
tack, for the little pepper-pot began to liven up. Jerking herself
free she struck an attitude, saying:

"You are just as bad as Mammy! _You_ know where she goes, and what she
goes for, but you won't tell me. Keep your old secrets if you want to,
but I'll find out, see if I don't. And I'll get even too. You and
Mammy think I'm nothing but a baby, but you'll see. I'm most eleven
years old, and if I can't be told the truth about things now, I'd like
to know why," and with a final vigorous wrench Jean freed herself from
her sister's grasp and fled down the stairs, Constance murmuring to
herself as the little whirlwind disappeared: "I wonder if it wouldn't
be wiser to let her into the secret after all? In the first place it
is all nonsense to _keep_ it a secret, and just one of Mammy's
high-falutin ideas of what's right and proper for a Blairsdale.
Fiddlesticks for the Blairsdales say I, when certain things should be
done. I'm going to tell that child anyway. She is ten times easier to
deal with when she knows the truth, and she can keep a secret far
better than some older people I might mention. Jean; Jean; come back;
I want to tell you something."

But Jean had gone beyond hearing. "Never mind; I'll tell her
by-and-by," resolved Constance and soon forgot all about the matter
while completing her English theme for Monday. Could she have followed
her small sister her state of mind would have been less serene.

Jean's first reconnoiter was the dining-room. All serene; nothing
doing; mother up in her room. Eleanor gone out. Mammy in the kitchen
stirring quietly about. Jean slipped into the butler's pantry. There
on a shelf stood a big white box marked "Lord & Taylor, Ladies' Suit
Dept." Jean's nose rose a degree higher in the air as she drew near it
and carefully raised the lid. "Ah-hah! Didn't I know it! I guess her
cousins-in-the-Lord must like candy pretty well, for she has taken
that box with her every single time she's gone to South Riveredge,"
whispered this astute young person.

Now it so happened that as Mammy had advanced in years, she had grown
somewhat hard of hearing, and had also developed a habit quite common
to her race; that of communing aloud with herself when alone.

Jean was quite alive to this and more than once had caused the old
woman to regard her with considerable awe by casually mentioning facts
of which Mammy believed her to be entirely in ignorance, and, indeed,
preferred she _should_ be, little guessing that her own monologues had
given the child her cue.

Clambering softly upon the broad shelf which ran along one side of the
pantry, Jean gently pushed back the sliding door made to pass the
dishes to and from the kitchen, and watched Mammy's movements. The
kitchen was immaculate and Mammy was just preparing to set forth for
her Saturday morning's marketing, a task she would not permit any one
else to 